Hondas are definitely a more simple bike than a Triumph. Easier to find parts as well. 
At mine in Canada we have one run by the undergrad student union (more of a loud music type bar) and one run by the grad student union (much more low-key pub, guiness on tap and servers know how to pour it, good indian food).
Democratic backed Dodd-Frank wanted to set up a fund that would have made it so banks had to set aside money in the case of a meltdown and so they wouldn't have to use taxpayer money, but still a funny meme.
It's a game played over 3 days and you lost. Take it on the chin and move on.
If you think saying a true words, even though they are harsh is coming of like a total jerk, then yeah.
what i really want to know is, why the guy who designed him hasn't beenf ired, and why Riot lies through their teeth every single time he's brought up. HE'S ONLY OVERPOWERED IN LOW ELO, or HE'S NOT POWERFUL AT ALL! what a bunch of fucking scumbags.
how do you like the domeless nail? I've been considering getting one myself
I'm not THAT old....okay maybe I am....once you graduate high school, time really begins to blur together.   The Disney Channel wasn't entirely amazing to begin with. It was nice to watch old Disney Afternoon shows, Disney movies, and then old shorts. Occasionally I'd check out after midnight since I'm an old school television nerd to the highest degree. (The Ink and Paint Club was basically a program where they showed all old Disney shorts. It used to be on frequently but then it got to a point where you could only find it on at like 4am)  I don't blame you though, the channels sucks big time these days. 
America doesn't invade countries we LIBERATE them. 
um, sharks AREN'T dinosaurs.
Damn those are big jugs.
A while ago I managed to strain a muscle in my lower back moving a heavy object ("heavy" here meaning probably around 40 pounds). Initially it didn't seem so bad, but within a few days I was unable to sit down for more than a few minutes without being in excruciating pain. Eventually, my back even became painful while I was sleeping. I became sleep deprived because I couldn't sleep for more than a few hours a night. Prescription painkillers were the only thing that let me have some rest.  It took over a month before I was able to sit down for more than 15 minutes without my back killing me, but that's when I swore I was done being an overweight lazy slob. My back had been bothering me on and off over the years (actually prompting a 30lbs weight loss a few years back) but this was the icing on the cake. Since then I have lost another 40lbs and am in the normal BMI for my height for the first time since I was in high school.  Was it difficult? Sure. It was no fun being hungry all the time when I cut my daily intake. But honestly being a bit hungry is a joke compared to the torture I had to endure those 4 weeks when my back was injured. And I think it was 100% worth it - my back problems have completely disappeared along with other issues I had when I was overweight - the chafing, the sweating, the inability to do physical activity for more than a few minutes without becoming tired.  That's what you should look forward to. Look forward to the time when you'll look and feel better than you do now because you put your foot down one day and said "that's enough" and accomplished something.
Shut the hell up.
How do you flop a straight on the river?
Back
I hope there's enough here: I forgot to take an orbital shot on duna, but I do have a shot of the anomaly to confirm the location. I'll take an orbital shot tomorrow in need be. http://imgur.com/a/k12bb I'd like to keep my current flare, thanks
It also makes you look like you're 11 and then I feel rapey and just want to get dressed and gtfo.
hawt
We all do.
I can; they wore stockings (as in hose, tights) back then in noir detective times. Not necessarily Christmas stockings.
You'll eventually learn the lowsec hotspots.  Akidagi, Tama, Rancer, etc.  Using wormnav on a lowsec system (or even using your starmap with active pilots in space/number of jumps/ships killed in last hour) will give you a feel for which systems are active.
Man, that's new.
It was definitely a rant.
http://www.canyoustayfordinner.com/2012/09/23/an-emmy-inspired-dinner/emmy-dinner-9/ The creator broke some lollipops and they look awesome :)
And progressively more awesome
Yeah, let's hack into your bank account then, I'm sure you'll find the "joke" in that.
Scyther skin for Kha'Zix
Not that big of a deal, didn't we have a bunch of 5-0 teams like 2 years ago? 3 undefeated teams sound reasonable to me, even more so when I think most people saw the Texans being one of them.
Relax, not everybody's alphabet has 'ä'.  Thats like getting mad at a reporter for not writing Hu Jintao like '胡锦涛 '. Different language, different spelling/romanization.  Now, off your high horse.
Creepy.  I had no idea Mormonism was like this.  I live on the east coast and never really run into them.
&gt;.&gt;
[My inspiration](http://www.reddit.com/r/RedditLaqueristas/comments/10pvaz/living_proof_that_practice_makes_perfectthis_is/)
This movie was such a pleasant surprise! And I usually hate 3D, but it was actually kinda cool. 
Sweet Jesus! Are you Spanish or something else?
La mayoría del contenido de reddit está en inglés, la mayoría de los chilenos no entiende inglés.
Better passing system by the AI when you press R2 to demand a pass. Easier to defend yourself after a shot, I shouldnt be getting fucking drilled after every shot I take without a call. Computer trades arent flat out fucking retarded, Ive only had two out of maybe 200 that Id even consider. Somehow less plays where the puck somehow doesnt cross the line if though it bangs off the top post and one of the side posts, and stays on the goal line or just bounces off the goalies back, this is hard to describe but Im sure if youve played as much as me you have been through it before where the puck should be in the net but some magical formula keeps it out.  I really enjoy the game anyway.
&gt;Collins was increasingly aghast at what Brown didn't know. There were so many simple things he had to learn: when to lob, when to throw a chest pass, when to throw a bounce pass. Things kids who've gone to basketball camps and colleges already know. Like footwork. "He was like a guy who wants to go into high finance, and he only took a couple of classes," says Wizards forward Popeye Jones.   Like I said, I'm just going off what people who were around him when hew was with the Wizards and Lakers...
Pics of gtfo?
I wore colored contact lenses and intentionally mismatched the colors so that I appeared to have heterochromia (two different colored eyes). This happened for about a year when I started high school. I felt pretty cool with one green and one blue eye until my parents stopped paying for colored contacts and they both went back to brown...awkward explanations to friends at school ensued. 
He could do both of those things too! A Betta and Neons. 
That body is insane!
The Giants lost to Vince Young last time.  I repeat, the Giants lost to Vince Young.
The flavour of red velvet is tangy with a hint of cocoa. If you only taste red dye, you have not had good red velvet.
And link it to us
I had 2(both in Rock Band). One was called Visions of Mel and the other was Black Santa's Sultry Elves.
Hopefully it's until the words 'I lost my baby' pass through his lips.
holy shit we used to watch "belly" whilist stoned. is this what the rabbit clip is from? 
Ah, an old favourite, [*Delphinia picta*](http://bugguide.net/node/view/5919/bgimage).
Mad props to you then man, you have more hope than me. I hugely respect you holding strong to your dreams in the face of adversity, that's an incredibly admirable quality.
Thank you for the polite reply.  you: &gt; There's also the social aspect, where **being treated like a guy** just leaves a bitter taste in your mouth being segregated by gender depresses you because you had the misfortune to be born with a penis,  you: &gt; why nobody treats you like them.   These *appear* to logically imply you want to be "treated like a woman."  (Right?)  So I'm curious: how do you want to be treated?  (Or not treated?) &gt; It's a discomfort in your own skin, and your brain looking at other girls your age with jealousy  Do you mean, jealousy of their beauty? . . .  
It is. In a good way.
None of the above
http://www.dailywritingtips.com/therefore-and-therefor/
&gt;Keep being positive and lets hope that the community that has surrounded this event stop anything like this from happening again. I'm going to break the positive part, but how is that going to work?  I think one of the reasons why this kind of crime generates such anxiety is because the difficulty in predicting, preventing and halting it. I don't want to detract from the fairly harmonious atmosphere, but I think a discussion about actual strategies to reduce this kind of crime are important, in conjunction with the symbolic gestures of street marches and the like.
That was a damn good episode. A really strong first half of this series I'd say.
How cheap is it cheap? I Was underage last time I was there.
think about what you just said.
also when my mum used to wake me up for school, she would just stand there and tell me to get up and wouldn't leave my room until I did.
I switched over to Hanes cotton boy briefs when I started C25K.  They stay put under my running pants.  
No player would go to the box, but they would just have to put out a PK unit.
At least you don't have to be worried about being kicked out of something. Your parents have to protect you, and if that means your mom protecting you from your dad so be it. You sound like a smart, strong girl and I know you'll be able to find some help. 
I don't use medicated feed, and see no reason for vaccinations in my flock either. Why do you think you need them for yours?
I need Vick, Jeremy Maclin, the Cowboys defense, and Jason Pierre-Paul to get 106 points more than Sean Lee, a Cowboys linebacker.
Mayo, Peanut Butter, and FUCKIN PINK BERRY
it will be the best counter for 4-5 carry picks, as sometimes in pub
I didn't go unschathed with people reminding me that I wasn't pleased about what I pulled, though.  But, in fairness, somebody next to me pulled a Vraska, so... yeah.  I'm justified in saying my best card was my promo card (Corpsejack Menace).  
this. no one remembers. gruden wanted to have control of the players davis declined his request
&gt;All we're saying is that DROs are probably the most efficient and effective way to resolve conflicts, because all other methods rely on monopoly law and monopoly enforcement. And if we know one thing about monopolies, it's that they deliver worse and worse products at higher and higher cost.  You forgot about that other method that involves small-scale, decentralized direct democracy. 
You won't regret it. We're all awesome here.
SHAME.
I'm attempting to watch it now.  Why are they torturing cats?  I can't watch that shit.
With 6% LS you won't see a problem. I have yet to find another lifesteal weapon that won't destroy my DPS by at least 10K. 
I think the Logging Camp spawns iron items, power bows, and the occasional grenade.
God damn it. Now I have to clear my browser history. AGAIN.
Pussy 
All they would see all day is kittens and puppies from those commercials
Thank you, that's what I told him. Thought I'd get a second opinion. And yes, he has a lawyer.
Sorry Packers, sorry power ratings, the cheese just isn't as good as everyone thinks they are.  Saints gave them a run for the money?  Saints couldn't beat the Panthers, Redskins, or Chiefs, who themselves can't beat anyone (wait, Redskins just got the first win (outside of beating the saints) between those 4 teams), 28-27 is pathetic.  Oh and the Seahawks got just as screwed from the refs the entire game, rather than just the last play.  I know this is not an appreciated topic, and will be blasted to oblivion, but this Packers are a top 10 team mentality is just ignorance.
I trim - I've shaved everything off a few times and ended up with ingrown hair and man, they are NOT nice.  As long as I don't look like the Jackson 5 down there - I'm a happy chap.
Uh, three zeroes on three inactives. Thought we were booting people like this for people who actually cared about their lineups?
Was that gif made with a potato?
I was never a good problem solver :(
I bet that this looked VERY modern in the mid-90s...  Well, the game should be [Bermuda Syndrome](http://www.mobygames.com/game/bermuda-syndrome)
Too bad he's a fucking Borg magnet. 
When I throw away a half bowl of rice, some kid in Africa isn't any worse off. Likewise if I eat the rest he doesn't get more food either. You want to solve starvation then you send excess food from farms over there, not excess food from my plate.
ooo camel blues as well, my favorite.
Broken already?
I drafted DMC, CJ0k, Gates and Nicks. Fuck me, right?
Thanks, for your comments. Have 2 upvotes.
Come into the light!
I am for anyone that promotes respect amongst the community, and I am against anyone that seeks to compromise that respect.   Let the Star Wars joke stay as a joke, please don't legitimize it. 
Sexuality is a bit of a continuum. If you fall in love with guys then that's the main 'thing'. Honestly though, try and find a little guy who you can throw all over the bedroom ;). Tbh as well... if you don't throw yourself into sex completely, it can suck a bit. Next time, just go at it with all your enthusiasm! And generally, don't worry! It takes practice to have good sex.   P.S. Purely if you want to get into buttsex, [this girl](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=83lo7OqruJI) is my absolute hero, (no it's not porn)
I have a similar thing to the Death Note one. In seventh grade (coincidence?) I thought it would be cool to slouch a little and be able to sit like L and laugh like Light. I didn't realize until maybe a year later why that wasn't actually attractive at all. I still get asked to do the "Kira laugh" sometimes. Good thing I forgot how! Haha... Ha...
Yeah haha even the second time they couldnt figure it out.
"*Yeah, sure* you knocked out three guys in the moshpit while following three girls to the bathroom where they all blew you."  That was an actual lie from my buddy. 
Valid point.
Revisionist history is a key criteria of a political hate movement.  Yes, this stuff is significant.
My people needs asap! 
[I found a clip of his performance in the episode.](http://youtu.be/JdfuhAoA_9M) Makes me cry like a baby every time.
Very gruesome, but it would sure as hell get a reaction out of the audience.
my breed will never die out. when your kind is eating pills for dinner and somehow wiping your ass with three seashells, my people will be lurking in the dark, eating rat burgers, and fucking with our own genitals.
I don't shave fully, but I manscape. I shaved once and thought I looked like a well-hung six year. I'm not a fan of that look, that's why I trim
do you think people feel victimized in tabloid sting operations?
I remember doing only two long(ish) passes over the middle today, the interception and the play where Laurent caught it and stayed down for a while.
I know... where to start. There's so many of them. There's just a lot of shitty people in the world... probably why I love dogs so much. 
To be fair, it just might be too complicated to explain . . . in a TV interview. But that's no excuse for not explaining it in another forum - a magazine article, and/or a long article on the Romney/Ryan website . . . unless, maybe, they don't really know, or don't want voters to know the details until after it's too late.
I'm a toto- I mean, uh, cyndaquil! ^yeah, that's it.  Just gonna, uh, slide right in.  *slides in, trips, disguise falls off*  Shit.
It could be any mechwarrior game.
Thanks!
Fucking glorious 
More importantly, were you charged. If so, go to your bank and request a chargeback.
Nevermind, I figured it out.
So much good stuff in that show.  Some continuity issues, but just a lot of fun.  Sony Trinitron, best color TV ever at 56 and change.
the problem there is that it isn't your fault that you have to "get off your ass". it's the burden of organized society that has made it so that you cannot do whatever you wish. in a perfect world if you wanted to sit on your ass and trip your whole life then you should be able to.
I'm going on my third season with my 390s 
I would love to take you up on that offer in trade of Bagon. FC:4728-4893-0986  I'll be around for the rest of the night and 5pm PST tomorrow.
Shadow of the Colossus.
I know a lot of people hate Tebow, but man, I agree with you. He's a good guy, even if he's not a very good QB. That night he threw for a ton in the play offs he went to spend time with his guests before even celebrating. his guests were a sick person and their parents.
&gt;I'd also say, depending on how much serious $ he's making and how old he is, he should be trying to max out his 401k contributions, and not just max out the employer match.   I agree but that's a different conversation.  Start with employer match as the minimum. 
You know when there's twins or something in a movie and they both move the same way at the same time? Like with their hands touching a 'mirror'?  I've made a mental rule about who uses their left and who uses their right in case I'm cloned or a future me comes. This isn't so much to confirm it's me but rather to impress onlookers.
I like to run with a group of 3 and do some guerrilla type attacks while on defense.
hmm... so you saw that, huh?
Basically
This misspelling of Manhattan?
my ex gf would queef all the time, it was impossible to have sex without everyone in the house hearing.
I would love to learn written music. I can easily learn a spoken language easily, I already know 5 and counting, but to be able to read sheet music and spit it out is a language in itself. 
For the sake of the human race, you have our permission to eliminate them.
It was announced to [March 2013](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/C/2011_L4) originally...
I'm for 'em!
 A state push to bring felony charges against noncitizens who voted in recent Iowa elections could run into two key roadblocks: local prosecutors who do not want to pursue the cases and jurors who may find no criminal intent.  The push to prosecute legal residents who were ineligible to vote because they are not U.S. citizens may raise questions about selective enforcement and whether they had the intent to commit fraud. Police and prosecutors this year already declined to bring some similar cases discovered before the statewide effort started, citing a lack of intent, the cost associated with the cases and the harsh penalties they entail.  In Linn County, home to Cedar Rapids, County Attorney Jerry Vander Sanden has declined to bring charges against a few persons who mistakenly voted twice during recent elections. The county auditor sought prosecution, but Vander Sanden replied in emails that those voters had "no criminal intent" to cast absentee ballots and vote a second time at the polls.  "I am not going to charge someone with a felony because they made an innocent mistake," he wrote in July.  http://www.sfgate.com/news/article/Iowa-voter-fraud-cases-may-hit-roadblock-of-intent-3887162.php
HAH
The basics of programming isn't very hard once you get into it and start thinking in that way. It's just ifs, whiles, fors and discretization. At least in the beginning. What language are you programming in? The hard parts come when you have to learn some numerical methods, sorting methods and optimization. That's about as far as I've come in my programming. Then I've heard of some scary thing called 'listeners'.
here's the original post.  He's 1 in 3000 and is sterile. http://www.reddit.com/r/aww/comments/utw8l/my_yoda_in_good_spirits_hes_15_and_recovering/
DoubleLift's Mechanics are a lot better.  But Aphro is pretty good.
And as he runs out of replacement parts, Rory starts getting smaller and smaller until, eventually, he's just a little robot dog... 
There is **NOTHING** in Ponyo to make you sad.
Having cavities drilled without novocaine.
well, I have a younger brother.  We fought.  Not a lot, but when we did, it was fucking savage.
[worst novelty account ever](http://andreworlowski.com/wp-content/images/comic_book_guy.gif)
Here is my norn guardian, http://i.imgur.com/ol6oO.jpg
Wow, that guy either paused the video coincidentally at that spot, or has autism. 
30 minutes before touching me down there?! Hell, no. I agree to the slow, but a good 10-15 minutes of fore play is perfect.
Yeah, that looks just like a cat face spider. I believe they eat other spiders and are good to have around.
I love you.
WDs seem to have the most diverse skillset in terms of # of viable/interesting builds. Monks on the other hand seem to have the least. I'd recommend you stick with your WD, but it's up to you, i suppose.
Awesome birth story.  Congrats!
You're welcome! ;)
If the rapist dressed up as a clown, yes.
I'm up by 29  He has Romo, Bears D, and Dallas kicker  I have a chance...not a great one though
Pictures please... because that would be SWEET
It's just a foreskin dude.
Jiggling the boobs, it's like grabbing extra fat, squishing that fat, and moving it around. 
It was time for Henry. He'd started having some injury issues, like problems with his sciatica (which if I recall correctly don't really ever go away, could be wrong). The team was still playing around him, but he wasn't the same player. Of course, he could have stayed, but the move seemed mutually beneficial (I think he'd also just divorced his wife at the time, so probably needed some kind of change).  His leaving allowed Fab to flourish. Plus, we still had Adebayor and RVP. Everything felt like it was on good terms.  RVP left us in a pretty terrible situation after talking the talk, but then when the time came for big decisions, he turned his back and walked away. And not only did he join Man U, as you mentioned, he came out with a pretty condescending statement about the club. You'd never see Henry or Fab say something like that about Arsenal. You could see how deeply disappointed Wenger was.
You don't want to have an actual conversation. You're either just being stubborn or trolling.
done!
shave off everything.
I first went when I was 6 months old. Of course, I don't remember any of it, but my parents said I had a great time!
There you go packer fans, have a game taken away from you last week and a game given to you this week by the refs.  you're even, now please shut up. 
I was with you until the end when I was like "Holy racist comment Batman!"
Yeah, that's the standard required amount. When I worked there I was usually just fine with doing one pass and asking if that was enough if a person said "a little," but then my manager saw me do that and flipped out in front of everyone, started demanding why I was shorting this person mayo, demanding of her if she'd specifically asked for only one pass, and then I lost my legally entitled break for bathroom cleaning duty.   Tl;dr: Subway managers are batshit crazy about mayo, and unless you go "ONE PASS OF MAYO ONLY" and are willing to look Satan in the eye and stand by your decision, Subway employees are going to shove mayo down your throat. 
The Rep Fleet Firetail also works nicely as dual prop
what if you get the healing troll priest creep.  would that provide enough regen to jungle?
God Damnit now I have to [watch it again](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9bZkp7q19f0)
they are fine for gaming and general use.
One of the houses near me has tinsel up already and my friend said he saw a christmas tree in someones house. This is a student area so it could be we're all too pissed out of our minds to know what time of year it is!
I'm confused by all this scared of razors talk too...does everyone have whipped cream for skin or what? I don't get cuts and I don't using shaving cream.
Yeah no you can be super butthurt about that. 
One of these days I'll attend synch-tube night.  One of these days 
That isn't trolling.
Why is there evidence you can cure other mental issues through psychology then?
His name is Mukhtar. His cock has been enhanced with silicone. There are some vids around with him in action. I'll see if I can dig some up and post links here.
I have to say, this was one of the most interesting nights that I have ever had.
I like to think it explains it fairly well in the start, but I wouldn't know from a non-gamer perspective.
Well, I was wrong.
Glad it's over. Good game Saints fans. You're having a rough start, but your team is way better than that record. Good luck this year.
Communities of sociopaths.
TIL the MTA is the Us Government.
Thanks folks. I was readin on how theres so many hybrids white x stripped, small x spotted, etc..but I appreciate the help. 
Found you ;)
Holy shit... Do you happen to be a six-year-old idiot child from Liverpool?
I'm more concerned about the ankle breakage on the right.
I'm Randy Butternubs. :(   edit: [context yo](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=JGOq5RhDtis)
(meta self contained g)
This reference has been taken too far. Someone call the circlejerk contention team. 
30 mb/s, and I pay $40 a month. It's split between three of us, though, so it comes out to around $13 each.
Lool i think that some of the comments below are a bit harsh, i think it cool too get a good enchantment on your first ever pick i didn't anywhere near that on my first pick enchantment :(
It doesn't, but its always the implication of the stereotype portrayed in the video.
Mom's time limit is really the screwiest part of the whole thing.  She wants babies to play with?  She can damn well have one of her own
Well played.   But you have to admit, you'd have to sift through a lot of crap to get the good stuff if this were the case.   Ambiguous yet intriguing trailers with movie titles that get described throughout the course of the movie seem to be the key for me.   Movies with titles like "Inception", "Lock, Stock And Two Smoking Barrels", "Snatch", "American Beauty", "Primer", "Twelve Monkeys", "Requiem For A Dream" etc. 
That's not the wand that did it.
I signed up for an account just to post... Wilforks hit reminded me of... http://www.quickmeme.com/meme/3pff29/
The first few episodes of Haibane Renmei are very slice-of-life, but it gets dramatic later on.
It does if you hold the button you opened the box with. When I open one, I use the "E" button and hold it to collect everything.
*This conspiracy's context:* **[So I went hunting with my sisters..](http://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/10q0vd/so_i_went_hunting_with_my_sisters/)**  ^Did ^the ^bot ^make ^a ^mistake? [^Message ^me](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=KarmaConspiracy_Bot&amp;subject=Error:\%2010qfv7&amp;message=Post\%20in\%20question:\%20http://www.reddit.com/r/KarmaConspiracy/comments/10qfv7/redditor_shoots_neighbors_dog_during_hunting_trip/\%0A\%0ACorrect\%20link:\%20) ^with ^the ^correct ^link ^- [^FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/KarmaConspiracy/comments/uu43r/rkarmaconspiracy_bot/)
We have J-Train, that's not a gamble.
Would have been even better if he got dragon too.
I leave girls alone. I could be a lot creepier!
It was a poor analogy, then. 
My Assassin is bugged as well but I fast forwarded.  Some things to check that may or may not help...  Are new quests you pick up level 50?  Is your active quest level 50?  What level are items from the slot machines?  This should give you a decent idea of how badly you're bugged.  Sometimes switching the active quest to a level 50 one helps.
Just posting my opinion. If you want to start something off of that its your deal :)
should be in /r/woahdude/ sorry for being a faggot
Here just let me get that bandage o- Oops! Looks like I peeled off some of your foot! 
I'd been wondering if they were just severely overwhelmed, or (possibly) a scam. It seems that they are actually just severely backlogged.  I placed my order on 19-Aug, and just received my shipping notification today (30-Sep.) It's too early to get tracking info, but it seems that there's hope.  And it does seem to be a really nice case; I'll find out when it arrives.
Yea, you pretty much got the gist of the Bieber hate.
Very much like the horizon you see in the distance. A general direction and a kind of "within-which". So: say we agree to address the question of the elections and are talking about anarchism. This is just an example. Well at this point, we would be talking about anarchism within the horizon of the elections. A light would be cast on the topic. We'd be making a way towards topics, or taking angles on topics, in view of the elections or elections in general, democracy in general, etc. The elections coming up do loom on the horizon. That's just one horizon or horizon type, really. It's pretty temporal in certain ways. And anyhow, that's an example, one is locak, the other general of a horizon. Local was, recall: say we agree to discuss anarchism within the horizon of the elections. Locally, that means our agreement to discuss this. We've set up a kind of false or very local horizon. Less locally is: the elections coming up. And far less local: let's think about anarchism, but especially in terms of democracy and the idea of voting. That's a more general "horizon". Then when you agree upon that (everything is not a simple matter of agreement), you're setting out in a kind of direction and within a certain light.   And horizons have "light": the sun casts a light, so too do horizons of issues or problematics, say. "In light of recent events" is a good case in point. This is a common enough phrase. It's a bit like saying: "keeping those recent events on the horizon, let us consider X". It is good to use the term, not good to badger it or try to nail it down too exactly. I'm not trying to be vague and can be very n-th degree or meticulous, but that's just the best way to use such a term.   So this can be explained easily enough. I'll assume just for the sake of seeing what this all means here that you may respond with: "Oh, OK, that's not really so tricky or opaque." It's quite easy, really. There is nothing especially troubling there. Indeed, that's going to end up being part of my point: that there is nothing especially troubling about a lot of what is possible in thinking. In fact...well here I go again...it's going to end up being so fundamental an issue as to lead to some other things.   On the other hand, I've been thinking in this shit for years, so it's easy for me. But on a third hand, let me add to this that I think with a fierce view towards amelioration and responsibility. What that means here is a bit tricky: it means that my path in thinking and my particular skills (this is not in order to talk about myself let me say clearly here) are very devoted towards applicability and serviceability. So in any case some things I say may look hard like someone is doing differential calculus and says "oh this is easy" but it's fucking not, whereas I am already well abreast of how explications should run and are feasible. This in turn relates to issues of poverty, btw.   Well I could go on but must run currently but I can explain more and an ethically devoted to such explicability btw. 
thnxs
yeaaahhhh.....a few problems here..... (A) I'm extremely lazy (B) my addendum would invariably be dozens of pages long (C) I'm extremely lazy. ;-)
i'm using some 200mm kahalanis, even if they are 45° they are as low as smokies (40°)  Edit: they don't give me wheelbite with the zig zags but I am planning on buying the wheels I mentioned above
I dunno...
I read the graphic novel edition (all the cool quotes and crap transcribed, dialogue transcribed, but faster) and I must say, the visuals on Dorian are stunning.  It gets across just how mind-blowing Oscar Wilde was being.
I always go Sadist early, maybe 1 level in HS, with this it allows you to boss it a lot more :P
Done. This song could cheer me up after like six breakups at once. 
&gt;Great pieces for great prices, but expensive and long shipping  When people are bitchy about grammar, sometimes they may have a point. Would be nice if they were nicer about it though. 
Well, I can tell you that in a typical LHC pp (proton-proton) collision, less than 1% of the total collision energy goes into producing any one particle. Protons are made of quarks and gluons, which are collectively called partons, and what happens in a collision is that one of the partons from one proton interacts with one of the partons from the other proton. Each parton carries only a fraction of its proton's total energy, so it's only that fraction that actually gets involved in the collision, and it usually winds up being a small amount.  However, I don't know how (or if) that would change if a black hole were to be produced. I think the black hole would be too small, and would evaporate too quickly, to pull in much energy from the other partons involved in the collision.
Um, I understand that you're probably patting yourself on the back because you think you've revealed my hypocrisy, and that's fine, except what I said is nothing alike what the user I was replying to said in tone, context, or meaning.
I use a sander.  40 grit.
Voting for Tesla!
Was her ass that bad?
This is awesome - thank you!
Oh. Neat, thanks.
Looks great! Might I suggest that you add a default tile set, so users don't have to upload there own just to get it working?
Waste of very precious time.
It's an animation that occurs when you trash a Passbook "card". It's supposed to be as if you ran the card through a paper shredder.
Virginia.
Where in florida? I'm around Tampa Bay.
nah, but hollywood has a cool spin on it.
Speculative: Injury?
October 23rd is the day. /official
  Okay, have the down vote back. I've made it a policy to down vote your bot, but I guess you intended to communicate to me directly. Sort of. With the wrong pronoun. Anyway, can you explain this bot to me. Satire? Just bravery for bravery's sake? Trolling? Perhaps if I had some context, I wouldn't hate it so much. You can respond as the bot and I won't down vote you, if that's how we're gonna roll.
Did you not like r/atheism's answers?
I feel like engineer as a class kind of fell short. A lot of the abilities are repetitive (just better versions of lower tier abilities). I would really like to see a dedicated 2h class and or a dedicated cannon class.
That would be amazing, I literally just discovered how to tab backwards. shift+tab, yo!
Yeah, that's definitely not reposting given the submission was to different subreddits.  I don't know why someone would get butthurt over it.  But as you said, I wonder what Reddit would be like, or was like, without the karma. Would most people stop coming up with clever posts because there isn't any incentive other than the karma?  Although some of those clever posts have received a lot of global attention, which can be good.  Meh, maybe nothing will change.
I go to gamestop all the time and I only have had a problem once. Other than that they are just generally great friendly people. The one problem I had was when I got a game for my birthday that I knew I didn't want to play. I think I already had a copy of it or something, I don't know. Anyway, I never even bothered to take the casing off or anything, I just brought it straight to gamestop. I tried to sell it to them for a used-game price, but the guy started telling me something about it going against policy since it wasn't used. I offered to open it, go grab my DS from my car, play a level, then sell it to them, but he said it wouldn't work because "[They would already know](http://gamercrash.files.wordpress.com/2012/01/the_dark_brotherhood_hand.jpg)" or something. I got pretty angry and just took it to another gamestop after opening it and had no problem.
Homophobia is a mental condition, and cannot be used to describe a set of words, although I agree that kind of speech contributes strongly to the problem.
[Yep](http://i.imgur.com/MBxXG.jpg)
Pelicans are known to store large long objects that smell kinda fishy in their beaks/mouth...just saying..there certainly are less fitting names for cheerleaders :|
That is not true. Most people who get talked out of it or do not succeed try it again. 
http://i.imgur.com/wwUMG.jpg?1 - My Engineer  Probably what I'll be transmuting until I hit 80.. (I have a ton of transmutation stones thanks to alts).
That really is mildy interesting. Could possibly be some karma in that knowledge, ya know? A TIL.
I shouldn't have laughed at that....  :/
SQUIRREL
Yeah, but that's just like... your opinion.
In fact Australia's Torres Strait islands come within 10 kms of mainland New Guinea.
This does seem like it's a cut and paste menagerie of bad sex-driven articles from other popular womens' magazines, paired with the plateauing popularity of a "mommy porn" novel, which makes everyone up at arms.   Is it a bad book? Yes!  Read a few passages, and you'll realize just how terrible the imagery, story arch, sub plots, characters, metaphors, and use of grammar is.  It is edgy because up until now, most women didn't openly express their interest in sexual literature, even though we have been reading, and writing it for DECADES. Men seem to have this weird idea that the only kind of pornography worth investing in is visual pornography. Women internalize a lot of their interests in sex, and tend to have just as deep sexual fetishes as most men, DESPITE the fact that we are *shamed* for having any kind of sexual urges, and are called "sluts" for having an inkling of desire for kinky fucking.   While men are very straight-forward about their sexual urges, "that woman looks hot, I want to stick my flesh rod inside of her tender bits" , ladies *tend* to (not saying this is true of every case) have a more complicated view of sex in terms of; relationships, compatibility, personal taste, attitude, stability, and have according fantasies.   Christian Grey represents what a lot of modern women lust after.  A ridiculously handsome man, with his own company, shitloads of cash he wants to spend on his lady,a hot body, a huge cock,with a sexual appetite to match, a dominant personality,  and attachment/possessiveness, but also having something to "fix". (which was kind of super fucked up in my opinion, and was a super turn-off for me)   While the book is very badly written, many women still find a kind of social unity in the fact that they aren't being shamed and singled out at the bookstore for buying one of these novels.  If you go up to a cashier with another (probably better written) "bodice ripper", you could expect to feel a bit of embarrassment.  Not to mention it falls under the advent of e-Books, so most women never have to step foot inside of a store.   While it seems almost a STANDARD for men to watch terribly written/ acted porn, ladies are being mocked for *READING?* 
"I told you i could do the helicopter!"
..I like that joke.
Oh, didn't realize you were talking about d6's. I'm used to using twenties for rolls.
i know im late to the party but mythbusters gave me my love of science. i remember watching it when i was really young. and like you i started to take apart eveything and put it back together(most of the time). just wanted to say thanks
Before I read the comments and just looked at the picture I thought "damn Raj is hot"
Keep them to trade/sell. Even if you don't need them now you can always get some value out of them.  Niv-Mizzet - $14  Gelectrode - $1  Brainstorm - $2  Dissipate - $1.50  Isochron Scepter - $6  Doomgape - $1.50  Eternal Witness - $5  Golgari Grave-Troll - $2.60  Jarad - $3.70  Life from the Loam - $11.60  Almost $50 from those alone!
I'd do it. Ryan is way more consistent than Romo and Richardson is just a few points a week lower than Rice. If you want consistency, pull the trigger.
Yes but do they Dry them first ?
If the gingersnaps aren't strong enough try ginger capsules. They work great as long as you're taking enough to have pungent ginger burps and you take them before you're feeling sick. Reed's Extra Ginger Brew has saved a lunch too.
I have a new goal in life. To be quoted by a Barbershop ensemble.
You're one stupid fuck.
I prefer to think Slender is saving the children from the Pedobear. 
It doesn't natively support flash.  You can sideload it easily.
The front page of AskReddit™ every. Fucking. Day. 
Such an emotional comment.
You're welcome. Enjoy!   Thanks.
Hi Dan,  As of now intend to take a VPS with Hostgator. Also, I have 2 questions: 1) Can I have different VPS accounts with different companies and control them all through a single WHMCS/WHMAutopilot installation ? And if Yes... What is that feature called ?  2) If I have a domain say XYZ.com. Can I have ns1.xyz.com and ns2.xyz.com with Hostgator and say ns3.xyz.com and ns4.xyz.com with say Bigbrainhost.com VPS. ns5.xyz.com and ns6.xyz.com with say webhostingbuzz.com VPS.  I feel there should be service that should allow me to set up different nameservers with different IPs at different companies.  Will be of great help if you can guide me with these 2 queries.
A degree isn't job training. Job training is job training.
this title is awful.
upvote for posting what he deleted
As someone who lives in Japan... I actually really appreciate this choice of schedule compared to the majority of other times when it's 8pm in NA on Sunday and I am at work Monday morning and can't watch anything. 
Not sure exactly because i don't like to count but id say im somewhere around 80% fat and protein. My only carb intake is from veggies and fruit and most of my meals are mostly meat with a side of veg and some fruit as a snack 
Hijacked my dad's cumbox, and also ate his jolly ranchers.
I'm skeptical this will be any good. This isn't being made by Sucker Punch and is in the hands of the developer behind "Ninja Reflex" and system ports. Letting them get their hands on the series makes me think there isn't much care going into this game.
I started watching right after De la Garza left the field, what happened?
inb4 the rest of reddit gets to this post and downvotes anything fraternity related.
Haven't we been over this like, a million times before?
I believe that's the joke.
I'd be happy to. 
I think Reddit broke the site...
I completely agree with paragraph one, so to paragraph two I say, *how you doin?*
Doing anything I want. Any time I want. And only having to check in with my parents first. 
The entire purpose of the presidential debates commission is to make sure that Ruling Party politicians never have to debate again.  The Ruling Party was furious that the League of Women Voters let Ross Perot show the  world what jackasses they are, and that's why they set up the commission.  If Johnson gets 15% in the polls, they'll raise it to 30.  If he gets 30, they'll raise it to 51%.  If he gets 51%, they just won't show up.
Age | User | Title | Reddit | Cmnt | Points :--|:--|:--|:--|:--|:-- 9 months | [d3rsty](/user/d3rsty) | [#1 reason to not pass out at a party...#1!](http://www.reddit.com/r/WTF/comments/n3fqe/1_reason_to_not_pass_out_at_a_party1/) | here | 168 | 424 5 months | [Generalhjort](/user/Generalhjort) | [Passing out with /b/ not the best idea ever..](http://www.reddit.com/r/4chan/comments/sq6ao/passing_out_with_b_not_the_best_idea_ever/) | [/r/4chan](/r/4chan) | 12 | 208 1 year | [KidB91](/user/KidB91) | [A 4channer tattoo's a penis onto the forehead of an unconscious party goer.](http://www.reddit.com/r/WTF/comments/ipdun/a_4channer_tattoos_a_penis_onto_the_forehead_of/) | here | 228 | 221 * See **2 more** matches at [KarmaDecay](http://karmadecay.com/r/WTF/comments/10q8zm/some_guy_on_b_4chan_tattoos_a_penis_on_a_somebody/)  *This is an automated response*   [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/help/faqs/SimilarImageBot) | [Send Feedback](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=SimilarImage&amp;subject=Feedback Id 10q8zm&amp;message=[Link to post](http://reddit.com/comments/10q8zm/\) 'I like feedback') | [Report Error](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=SimilarImage&amp;subject=Error Id 10q8zm&amp;message=Have you read the FAQ? Please specify the error.[Link to post](http://reddit.com/comments/10q8zm/\) 'Help me grow')
"Is there any evidence outside of western propaganda that the Soviet Union was as bad as you claim?"  This is about as nuanced as the arguments of holocaust deniers, or members of the flat-earth society. The people posting on this thread claiming that Stalin was responding to some grand Nazi conspiracy, clearly have an ideological axe to grind, and won't be diverted from that by anything as trifling as facts, or the historical record. So Stalin really thought that the entire leading cadre of the Bolshevik Party, composed of revolutionaries who had proven their uncorruptable character in the struggle against Tsarism, were in league with the Nazis?  Trotsky, Rakovsky, Kamanev, Zinoviev, Bukharin, Radek, Piatakov, Sokolnikov etc. And the artists Babel, Mandelstam, Pilnyak etc. etc. All Nazi spies? Really? Even though half of them were Jews who had spent their entire lives fighting for socialism?  Do you think it was the bureaucrats and careerists who Stalin surrounded himself with who represented the heritage of the October Revolution, and Bolshevism? People like Vyshinsky, the lead prosecutor during the Moscow trials, who had been a right-wing Menshevik, and opponent of the October Revolution, until he found a comfortable position in the Soviet bureaucracy?
Now watch a walk in the woods on YouTube.
Then you should know what goes on in reddit. I don't know why you don't.
It's probably your personality.  Work on being more outgoing.
for 100$ you can get an awesome racquet. Don't waste money on anything not full graphite.
Does the controller work in other games?  If yes - Okay, your controller is fine. Doesn't steam like a common glitch, have you tried going into your control settings in-game, and seeing if you can change it from keyboard + mouse -&gt; gamepad.  If no - Try another USB port, on the front or back. Is it plugged in properly? Does the light on it light up? 
He only did what I wanted to do the moment the dancing started
Fucking double guns Anthony!
So, what high school did you go to?
Reddit has delivered.
I'm just sick of "They're not all like that" being a shield, simple as that.  You can keep accepting the actions of a group which are endorsed and supported by local law, government, and society on the basis that there are exceptions if you so chose, I don't.  I'd like to see a bit of outrage from the Muslim world about the actions of these assholes, instead of just being offended when a no-budget hate video surfaces from a jerkoff in Florida. They're intentionally being worked up and hiding behind this "Not all like that" bullshit as justification for treating them with kids gloves.  Too bad, they're like that.  If they don't like it, they should stand against it.  Some do, and I respect the hell out of them.  Those that marched on the bases in Libya for example.  HUGE respect for that.  Wish more did.
Agreed, /r/rape, /r/rapecounseling and /r/RapeIsBadDontDoIt should be banned. 
Wait a minute.   You say people are allowed differing opinions.   Then you say I'm silly, because I've got a different opinion to yours...
No, biff logged on my wireless once. I did not use him as an alt ever. Where did I say that?
I joined a random ace server and I couldn't even figure out how to get a gun. Then I got kicked because I drove a tank off somewhere because it was the only thing I could find that shoots. 
What you're looking for is pan-sexual men, and there's plenty of them out there.  Some bi-sexual guys might be alright with it, as well.  I'm bi-sexual and I'd be open to an intact trans-woman.  I wouldn't be interested post-op, however.  The surgery and everything that results from it just kind of grosses me out.  Pre-op?  Sure, I'd be all on board for that.
Hahahahahahaha!
The state of Wisconsin is beautiful, Wisconsinites on the other hand are the complete opposite.
http://www.paulekman.com/  This guy did a investigation on and made it into a system called FACS that studies microexpressions and lets you know how the person is really feeling when they talk about things.  It's really good.  If you don't want the full system, get his book Telling Lies.  It's pretty good.
And book 2  And book 3
My first response was "Dude, fuck them."  Now I don't have to say it.  I do have to say this, however:  Go to Target and get yourself some maternity leggings.  They're the best thing that ever happened to a fat girl and I may never wear normal leggings again.
[Get Him To The Greek](http://www.imdb.com/title/tt1226229/)  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Q8lY5HxYGS4&amp;feature=fvwrel
No. That's the worst part!
Sounds more like it's a problem with the Mac version of Flash  Stupid Flash. Just die!
Sounds like you have [fooled yourself.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Placebo)  25 fps is perfectly playable and usually medium settings are fine.  I have played games at gaming cafes with ultra powerful machines and the same games at home on my craptop.  My scores do not change, I don't become a gaming god on one or the other.  The only time I do badly is when I am off my game, nothing to do with whether or not the anti-aliasing is as crisp as I want it.  A good craftsman does not blame his tools.  Maybe you are just playing poorly in larger scale battles, which also  lead to reduced frames.
Coming soon John's [calculator](http://imgur.com/5C2lM)
i wouldn't put it past mangini to have tanked that game on purpose to screw the pats and get a better draft pick. there was nothing for the jets to play for
I say that vast majority of those accounts will go into freefall, fucking over dozens of games on their way down. This should definitely not be allowed and I have lost some respect for aprhomoo. 
Yes but if you freely choose to be together because you like it better than being apart, all that shit is nothing. 
Unless it is the Black Panthers!
Literally every single one of those expands government and takes away freedom and choice.
Me: Oh hey it's midnight, Sunday, and you have school tomorrow. Let's watch Doctor Who until 4am.
And here I thought the hippocampus was part of the brain.
"wow you are playing jungling? n00b" and "why no call mia on jungler" were ones i heard alot
I honestly don't remember the guy shooting himself in the head. I only remember the anchor saying "getoffitgetoffitgetoffit GET OFF IT!"
Skip the toner if your skin is dry!  You need moisturizer for dehydrated skin.  Personally, my secret tip is using Alpha Keri oil after I get out of the shower. You MUST apply it to wet skin, then just gently *dab* it off. It's great and super cheap:  http://www.walgreens.com/store/c/walgreens-shower-%26-bath-oil/ID=prod4130119-product  It's used as a bath oil though so make sure you check in the right section of drugstore. 
Lo que ayuda mucho es encontrar alguien con quien puedes practicar.
"Yeah, and I like barbecue.  Fuckin with me?  I'm fuckin witchu."
please excuse the image quality. the point of the post is that i had a flashback to a salvia trip i was so high.
Planet eclipse Etha or etek. Could buy used egos 
It sounds like fucking Jurassic Park back here.  We got some Hornbills about a month or two ago, and every few hours they start honking away, sounds like a mix between a goose and a Viloscoraptor  *I accidentally a whole word.
how old are you/where are you from?
This wouldn't happen to originate from reddit. Would it? And why do you fap when you shiver?
It is a good idea to avoid associating your real name with your reddit account.
Two new polls out of Massachusetts report that Mitt Romney is on track for an epic loss in the state where he served as governor -- possibly the worst home state beating of any presidential candidate in over a century.
if only.
In the Redwall community, they call it "LOGALOGALOGALOGALOGALOGALOG!"
You reload vehicle weapons with the default reload button, although I'm guessing you mean where do you replenish your ammunition. For aircraft you need to find a friendly landing pad and practically land on it to restock your ammunition after a little bit of time (you can tell where this is because it'll be a big white decal on it with three bullets in a box). Ground vehicles are a bit more tricky as you're impeded by speed, but at some bases there is an ammunition tower (with the same decal--three bullets in a box) and when you get near it you restock ammunition slowly. The Sunderer also has a certable feature that, when near one, it automatically replenishes your ammunition as well.  The certs that require 99999 cert points are certs that haven't been properly tested or are certs that aren't ready to be tested yet OR they are certs that are temporarily disabled due to unforeseen bugs or gameplay reasons (like the Galaxy's AMS cert). You're not supposed to access them yet.
Won't somebody please think of the subpixel rendering???
Since N'Sync were super cool and everyone wanted frosty tips on their head like Justin Timberlake, I bleached my hair with sun in. My hair was the most disgusting shade of orange. Luckily even in 3rd grade I realized it was a failure and didn't try that again. So I moved on to Lee Pipes...
And that is how he makes his money.  If he was nice, boring in bland he would have no other marketable skills.
Made it all the way to [the chest](/spoiler) used tellipills hoping it was a full health pill and got trapped in a closed of room. Had Full attack and Brimstone. Never been so annoyed in my life!! Well until i found out that the left hand achievement hasn't unlocked properly and therefore doubt that i will ever get platinum God Achievement!!! Oh Issac why do you hate me so ^^
ERMAHGERD, THRRERPERS
I'm not a big fan of Red Lenses.
May our glorious Leader show our southern brothers the true way!  May they through down their arms and join us in our crusade of unification!
lol fuck a goomba
You want adorable Dashie pictures? [Don't say I didn't warn you.](http://nightmaremoons.deviantart.com/art/There-s-a-filly-in-all-of-us-307684396)  And if you haven't had a heart attack yet, I bring to you the level of [cuteness that is too high to measure](http://chubble-munch.deviantart.com/art/Dashie-Drinkin-314773012?q=boost%3Apopular%20meta%3Aall%20max_age%3A24h&amp;qo=323).
I'm gonna have to give this a try. But I'd never sell back Halo. Love that game
SER NER LERV FER FERSH ERND TERTLERS ? HER SERD.
Interesting commentary. I agree with more of it than I did the original NYT article.  So if Romney does land a zinger, maybe Obama should laugh and say, "well, Mitt, I must say, your staff is really funny and you seem to have practiced that one very well." Obviously, he'll say no such thing. That's Joe Biden's job.
I get goosebumps when I hear that shit. Fucking awesome. 
 We put thirty spokes together and call it a wheel;   But it is on the space where there is nothing that the usefulness of the wheel depends.   We turn clay to make a vessel;   But it is on the space where there is nothing that the usefulness of the vessel depends.   We pierce doors and windows to make a house;   And it is on these spaces where there is nothing that the usefulness of the house depends.   Therefore just as we take advantage of what is, we should recognize the usefulness of what is not.
Boom. Site crashed.
I did that last year and loved my costume.  People kept asking and I kept having to say I wasn't anything in particular but it really wasn't as big of an annoyance as I thought it would be.  I liked being something unique and it looked damn good.  
went with Vick...
That specimen definitely looks like a robot...
I thought this was funny.
If Hi Rez (as a developer) were a movie, they'd be The Money Pit. Key theme of the movie was a house that seemed great and an awesome value at first, until the people who bought it found out everything was actually broken.   http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Yil2jWQ5Oqg  Take it from Tribes. Once Smite is released, support will slowly be dropped for whatever new game is on the agenda. 
Agreed. I'm in the band section and at first I didn't see who he was throwing it to. Then I saw the wide open receiver and was like "RUN YOU MAGNIFICENT BASTARD!!!" Unfortunately we didn't have anyone downfield to set up blocks. GREAT game though.
I'm not down-voting you for defending Justin, I'm down-voting you for generalizing everyone here.
I haven't been active quite as recent. Try contacting Yerou, I believe he's still more active on the civcraft server.
UPVOTE FOR YOU SIR
That is the most brilliant bullshit, I've ever heard. At least they didn't start that way. In Bleach that one girl has boobs bigger than ichigos sword right off the bat.
There's blatantly porn in that box.
i have and given a sample i am waiting to hear back now ...
Exactly! I was thinking "Wait, I love giving her head, so what's the difference?"
Once again animal rights activists trying to change a culture that has been around longer then it has... First seal clubbing, whale hunting and now this
Is this the definition of meta?
I use a bodum glass infusion pot, probably not the best, but it was like $20 and seems to do the job.
I do really hate it when people over simplify their criticism of Islamic dress. The last criticism I saw on here was some ridiculous fundamentalist feminist spiel.  Although Islamic tradition and belief is largely archaic bullshit that has long been superseded, I am often amazed at the naivety of those who blindly fault it. That fact is that some of these traditions were, often failed, attempts to solve social ills and that there is a fundamental truth to all of them. Those that might have seen some success were often only viable for the conditions of the time. I hate those who criticise solutions yet cannot even begin to fathom the problems they were meant to address.  The feminists whine on about how it somehow concludes that men can't stop themselves from giving into temptation. A nasty, vile little psychological trick where they pass their own agenda under the guise of standing up for the other side. Of course, anyone with a little sense would understand the suffering unsatisfied temptation can cause. They completely bypass this issue though.
It was never funny. 
Calling names ...don't be so immature. It's a friggin cars post....you need to calm the fuck down.
The Omnivore's Dilemma. Great book on what we eat in america.  
I'm just happy Billy gave him a good place to go, and to re-unite with Gio. 
 No more water for you :P
I do it all the time with a blade its fine
I think it's along the lines of, if it's bigger than a hut it must be a temple.
That's not the safe word. 
Have you noticed that more kids rush for your fraternity just because you're in it.
My stealth technique. Have a 4 part grinder (with kief screen and catch) Put herb in toothed section, replace lid and put in freezer prior to grinding. Leave in freezer 30min+ take grinder out of freezer, turn upside down and grind (upside down means it keeps grinding without falling through.) Turn right side up, give a few more twists to get the rest of the bud to fall through and then start shaking like a motherfucker. Open up kief tray, marvel at the ammount you have been able to force off your bud. Roll a normal tobacco cigarette, but sprinkle the kief all over the tobacco. Smoke in public with a spliff that smells like tobacco and gets you high like a primo joint.
stop saying "crush". men don't say pussy shit like that. 
It actually sounds better in Thai.  I translated a bit too literally.  "Keep in touch" is probably a better translation; it is also a lot funnier given what it is written on.
I´ve meet so many nice persian women and you post shit like this. 
Honestly? Both. :( Sat down to see lions field goal, assumed they got the ball first. Getting food for halftime, missed the punt return. It was pretty ridiculous.
your teeth look yellow, but your not ugly
Anyone know K'ril from Zamorak God Wars Dungeon?   Yeah... I'm fucked.
I just came!!!!!!!!
It'd be cheaper (time=money wise) and take much less effort to have a shop do it.
What schools are you looking at attending, and what is your likelihood of getting into them solely based on your grades and SAT/ ACT scores?  Most schools look first at your grades and scores, and only if you are an iffy applicant will they really focus on your extra curricular activities and work history.  I very much doubt doing an extra year of gymnastics will make you a stronger applicant to most colleges.  It just isn't that important.  Focus on your grades.  
Children are starving in Africa and you're just throwing onions in the trash. 
Actually they were engaged at 6.  Under Islamic jurisprudence, parents are legally allowed to engage their children against their will.  However, under islamic jurisprudence, nobody can actually ***marry*** (with all the rights and obligations) until they hit puberty (menstruation or nightly orgasm) AND have a minimum age of 9 (because of Aisha).
So solid...thanks!
still is :D
REPOST!
Yes.. but all that takes is just a bit of acetone &amp; a qtip or something. 
In the first panel, Obama just stated that small towns have been lacking jobs. He said nothing about fixing that. 
Please only repeat every three months.
Which isn't even a problem, considering he's not from Italy.
Thank you! Fate is such a good series and Rin is so cute. This is actually my first cosplay but I immediately changed out of it a few hours later because I was so uncomfortable with people looking at me. Hopefully the next cosplay will be more successful in terms of longevity. 
Removed: Not Drama
I prefer a machete.
There's more of my comment for you to respond to. I'll wait.
Oh I'm not worried at all either. We kick ass. Just glad he was working out kinks against Wazzu instead of like USC or some shit.
I'm on my phone, so I can't feasibly post screenshots, but you have lines that outline shadows that are a different color from the shadows. Either delete those lines, or set the stroke color to the fill color. This is especially prevalent in the hair and the clothes. The strokes could use quite a bit of smoothing as well. My suggestion would be to redo it, only this time do it more slowly and pay more attention to detail
[](/twiwhy)Oh god why!? I thought "Cupcakes" was bad!
What was the answer?
Uh, what did Mr. Nerf_Hurrdurr do? 
You must be new here.
&gt;A. The draft.  The draft (that thing which hasn't been in place for decades and has basically no chance of ever being put into place again, plus there are actually arguments in favour of the draft based on economic equality and frankly it's all a moral minefield) isn't given to men because men are disposable and women are valuable, it's given to men because only men are considered capable.  Men are the protectors and the leaders and so men go out and fight in order to protect people.  &gt;B. Media and classic literature.  The same media and literature where the vast, vast, vast majority of protagonists and heroes are male? Go look up which academy award winning films pass the Bechdel Test, I'll wait.
Would you rather have to choose which of your children to let die or have to choose which of your parents to let die?
I spy a raspberry pi (background).
Probably one of the quieter players but Jon Beason from Carolina.  Oaklands kickers? But I guess their talents are used to full potential there.
Alright, look.  Your friend moved away a year ago.  A drunken creep who can't handle rejection managed to worm his way into your spare bedroom.  Who the fuck is this guy?  He's not the dude you hung out with.  He's some jackass who can't get laid and figured you'd be a push over.  You need to tell him just what you told us but take no blame, offer no consolation.  Be aggressive.  Don't let him think he'll be able to manipulate you.  Something straight forward and simple.  "Look, this isn't working out.  I thought you'd be cool.  Instead you've done nothing but remind me of why I stopped being your friend in the first place.  I offered to let you use my spare room since you were coming back to town.  I'm not at fault because you thought with your dick.  The only reason I haven't kicked you out is out of respect for our friendship but that obviously means fuck and all to you.  I want you out.  Pack your shit and find some place else."
Thank you :)
I saw.
Let me guess, Blordecai and Bligby?
god damn! huge blow to my childhood
It has a very unique sound to it.  I wasn't sure if I liked it at first, but it grew on me quickly.  Thanks for sharing!
Nice. I love TWM. Don't see enough TWM or CDE on these types of forums. 
CHALLENGE ACCEPTED 
trolls think fashion is stupid
Thats ages away
I was thinking about H-mart. Seeing as its close to my work. Wasn't sure if they would have it. Though they do have a wide variety of exotic foods.  
Please tell me you're not their parent.
I'm sorry but this is such a general, boring component list and build, it looks like every other one posted on this site.  Buildapc should start a business where they build and sell just this becuase its exactly what they tell everyone to build anyway.
My Best friend LOVED this charcter
I like you. Good game.  I hope our bitching throughout the game doesn't diminish the fact that you guys played really well.
This one girl who I thought was super cool broke her leg in second grade. She got a lot of attention and special treatment for it in class so naturally I was envious. So what did I do? I tried to break my leg by throwing myself off of an old mattress that was propped up against the wall in my house. After one try I gave up when I realized how much that sucked. Also in first grade this other girl had one of those ear warmer bands around her head when we were bundling up to go outside and for some reason I wanted one... Went home and found an elastic Little Mermaid head band and wore it around my ears like I was hot stuff. I was a strange child who coveted strange things.
Uh.. you said god can rest on a cloud. The question here is if he can *land* on a cloud?
it gets harder once u graduate high school and the hormones level off
As much as I'll miss Nicks tonight, be will be just fine with Cruz and Barden, especially if he catches like he did last week.  Eli also has Hixon and Bennett to throw it too as well.
&gt; I can hear it easily even with cheap headphones.  Sorry but you are kidding yourself big time if you think you can hear the difference between 320 and FLAC on cheap headphones. Even discerning between 192 and 320 is hard but doable with a decent set of cans+amp+dac, the difference between FLAC and 320 on a decent setup is damn hard to hear. [There is NO way you are picking between 320 and FLAC on a set of crappy headphones alone.](http://i.imgur.com/3vUYZ.jpg)
&gt;(Plus I just miss that awesomely sleazy feeling of seeing someone I want to chat up, and pre-gaming by spritzing a shot or two of Binaca into my mouth. So very Leisure Suit Larry...)  I know that feeling ;)
well the last movie i saw was jennifers body so..... i could think of a couple of fun things i could do as megan fox
I think I just saw too many boobs?  Is that possible?
You mean that guy who was prescribing me shit at the clinic wasn't a doctor?  No wonder he operated out of his van...
He's just far too busy lying his fucking ass off at every available chance. 
◔ ⌣ ◔
dat ass
I just don't understand why 2k has this in the game. You can't pause the game when play is live any other sports game I can think of.
Now that I have thumbprints on my monitor...
I don't see how you can see this and think 'wtf'. Yes, people have sex. Does that shock you?
My favorite verse is John 3:16 "For God so loved the world that he gave his one and only Son, that whoever believes in him shall not perish but have eternal life... Except gays" wait a second...
Show me a Muslim news source that cites this as the motivation behind the violence, as opposed to righteous indignation about blasphemy.  Muslims seem to have a habit of misdirecting their unrest at the whim of their religious leaders. The people who pull the strings enjoy weaponizing the angst of their followers, and everyone involved is complicit in that disgusting abuse of religion.  I'm reminded of owners tormenting animals for dog fights.
Teach him agnostic theism. From there he can learn to think with reason and scientifically while retaining his belief in a deity, which could comfort him until more ready to move towards secular thinking.
Yea, KJV isn't helping things here.  It's saying "Don't answer the fool because X, Answer him because Y". To say this is a contradiction- or even confusing - is absurd (which is what OP was doing).
clear the system cache, worked for me when I had the same problem. Might have to re download the updates for your games but that doesnt take long!
oh yes, my username i use today originates from my Starcraft gaming.
so spacious
Fucking Zubat...
Mhmm. PON3 Con After Dark was awesome, 10/10 would attend again.  (and I got SOOO MUCH BRAEBURNED ART)
Couldn't tell you, I don't own a 3DS. Pokemon White 2 + Black 2 will be on the regular DS systems as well.
Thank you for this post
[I have this play framed on my desk.](http://i.imgur.com/Q7ALK.jpg)  
I prefer 'Killing for Dummies'.
Why even say how long it took? Then it would have just been a neat drawing.
The closet economist in me adores this idea.
How about other instrumental stuff? J Dilla, Madlib, Cut Chemist, Nujabes, Clams Casino, DJ Shadow etc? Also if you're looking for alternative stuff I'm sure you've heard of Jurassic 5. 
Nana in Peter Pan was a [Newfoundland.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Newfoundland_%28dog%29)
Mostly shard runs of Arah, AC, and CoF still in my server.
Why not just watch youtube videos on flexibility training? Or pirate bay works too for his videos instead of wasting $100 on something that may not work for everyone. 
Prick.
Foxit is not free though.
&gt; My problem with evolution is that even the most sagacious advocates of it...agree that it has NOT been wholesalely accepted...even in house.  "Wut?" - Ben
but most matches take less than 42 years
Mostly the first. Because it's hard to coerce people into involuntary staying in a state (since travel is nearly zero-cost), and because people don't want to lose the wealth they've acquired, conflict is kept to a minimum. It really isolates the variable of the State's tendency to change incentive structures. Because it can force people to participate in war, or at least extort the financing for it, war happens often in the real world not because it is in the interests of the people, but because elites can shift the costs of war onto the people and keep the benefits for themselves.
Sketch57
I can give you some advice for France, but I'll consider that you have at least a week to visit the country :  -Do not miss the Mont Saint Michel in Normandy, at any cost. It's the absolute best tourist destination ever. Maybe visit that site in the morning and noon, and take the rest of the day to visit the Normandy region in general, which is nice cow-country, true rural France (also, there are the WW2 beaches - with German bunkers and all, and allied cemeteries, which may interest you if you're American).  -Hit the "Chateaux de la Loire", or "Loire Castles" in English I guess - those are essentially beautiful, lush and rich Renaissance castles along the Loire river which is center-west of France. There are tons of them but maybe you should take a few days to see the most highly regarded ones (internet search). It's a nice region to cruise through too.  -In Paris, which is the obvious destination, check out the Père Lachaise cemetery (do an internet search to fidn the graves of famous people). Perhaps, you can also take a bateau mouche, those are pretty nice because many of the most beautiful buildings are along the Seine river : http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bateau_mouche  Otherwise, visit the Notre Dame Cathedral, walk the steps of Montmartre, and if you like crowded massively huge museums, I guess you need to go to the Louvre. Also, there are places that tourists tend to not visit much : the "Panthéon", which features the graves of famous French people like Voltaire or Hugo, http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Panth%C3%A9on,_Paris , or "Les Invalides" http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Les_Invalides which is a War museum and houses the tomb of Napoleon. In terms of security, you might want to avoid North-Eastern Paris which are the poorer parts - most aren't slums, but I guess you're more likely to get mugged there than in the other parts (I've gone there hundreds of times and have never gotten mugged, so don't be too paranoid, it's just the least sure places in the city).  -If you want to check out the Mediterranean coast, avoid Marseilles, go to Cannes or Nice, or even Monaco (which is a separate country, as you surely know).  There, that should give you a broad idea of the country. Obviously, you won't have enough time to see less well-known things.
Ever momentarily remembered something you were supposed to do, stop abruptly and turn around? 
You win the whole internet!
What if I have not chosen (0, 0) to be the origin? Or if I do not select any special origin point of R^2 at all?
That was in poor taste, but I laughed so hard at it.
He is going to use school software on the family computer in the office and in 2 years he will get a laptop for school work.
The banter with the doctor was hilarious.  Loved it when Carra came in!
But you can't make out with a dinosaur very well.
Dicks! that i bet has em, checked walmart and super K too. Thank you!
much better.
It's worth noting that it is not yet clear that what is discovered is the Standard Model Higgs boson.  It is known that there is a particle that has been discovered, but we don't yet know that it has all the necessary properties to conclude that it's the Higgs boson (spin, decay channels).
Nitpicking one word huh? Interesting form of debate. Well I won't let this go unanswered.  &gt;I'm sorry, but threats are not threats unless they're actionable  Threats are threats. A threat is a declaration of intent to inflict harm on someone else. Whether the person is actually capable of following through on the threat is unimportant to the definition of a threat. The point of a threat is to intimidate someone in order to control them, to bully them into submission. You don't need follow through for a threat to be a serious issue.  Furthermore, she gets so many threats. Who is to say that one of them doesn't figure out where she is and that one of them is just crazy enough to try something? Isn't 4chan in particular famous for its ability to "dox" people?  &gt;If those comments really counted as threats XBox live would have been taken down a long time ago.  Comments do count as threats and users who make threats on Xbox Live are banned.
I mean do it however you like, but I never understood why everyone tries to avoid awkwardness.
neopets chatrooms....the baby version of reddit. 
Well that sucks.
Please see the sidebar for: [Guide to airfare search engines](http://www.reddit.com/r/travel/comments/pkl3z/can_we_get_a_few_links_into_the_sidebar/).  Also you're thinking of [flying standby](http://www.google.com/#hl=en&amp;output=search&amp;q=flying%20standby) and it's just rare these days. They usually end up going to the gold members / frequent flyers of that airline anyways.
I tend to have a non-dogmatic approach to applying the NAP to animals. In general, I think that anything that can argue (even non-verbally) against some inhumane treatment has at least *some* claim the status of an "actor", and therefore some claim to the protection of the NAP.   The question is "how much?". I usually feel that the degree to which a particular cruelty towards animals can legitimately be outlawed based on the NAP is roughly proportional to their observed objection to the treatment and the sophistication of their species ability to ideate about their treatment.   I say species, because it's almost impossible to say in any one case how much a particular individual animal is going to object to some mistreatment without mistreating it, which kind of un-begs the question if you'll pardon my twisting of a term.   This is also how my argument extends to the question of whether babies or invalids should be allowed to be mistreated because they can't argue back. No, they can't, but members of their species can, so they get the benefit of the doubt. 
I do. Stout, a Dunkel and two hard ciders are fermenting.  
That sounds fun. I wish my boyfriend stayed up until 3-6am.
Yeah that looks great. Any more specific into on where that place is?
In egypt you're only required to be sensitive if the blasphemy is against certain sects of islam, christianity or judaism.  Hindu? have at them.  Bahai? all yours.  Buddhist? who cares.
Yes, if you insist i will go on a date with you. 
are you running out of ideas??
No
Dark Souls starter boss. No thanks.
That's cool.
It's hard at first, religion does that to you - it acts as a crutch and when you lose it, it can feel like you're in freefall. But it always gets better with time. Keep giving him support and words of encouragement and recommend professional help if you think he needs it.
Yes. Make us out of replenish able building materials. Would both make us freaky resilient and be kinda crappy for the guy who has to give up his parts
I can't speak for him, but feelsbadman.
I'm the guy who created the video. Quinton Sung is amazing and I support him. I also realize my Hail to the Thief melodies are imcomplete. It was more of a test video than one trying to get views. However In Rainbows and the Bends I worked on a lot. I mostly created the videos because Quinton Sung hasn't posted anything new in 2 months.
[](/celestiamad)She knows the score... I'm ALWAYS watching.
[Jinrui OP](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=5Jgd2dklbaQ)
Comcast from Foxridge. It's always fluctuating, but this is what it is now: http://www.speedtest.net/result/2212894620.png
I think there's a difference between talking casually and swearing and having your cover photo be you and your friends wearing only cardboard beer boxes as clothes. Which is apparently a thing because I've seen people do it.
I love wussy guys for some reason 
Yea I did that already with a ps3 and lap.  She didn't take to it on her own :(
You have to buy peanuts and mix them with the candy corn and/or pumpkins... its the sweet and the salty that makes it all sooooo goood :)
On paper, quad cores are great. In practice, Intel has much better performance per core than AMD. Plus this motherboard can take an i5, the slowest of which should outperform every desktop AMD chip currently available.
Best comment I've read all day. 
That was long; but made up in exciting incoherence what it lacked in brevity.  The internet is not really a window you scream out of at strangers.  It's a mirror, bj.  Have a little pity at that poor fool staring back at you.
That's the first I've heard of this happening.
Does your router have a built in switch? If it does, there will be more open ethernet ports on the side of it that you can connect to. If not you'll need a separate [switch](http://images.highspeedbackbone.net/skuimages/large/L48-1160r.jpg) to connect to the router, and then connect both computers through the switch
There is no shame in that. 
But you also have Reddit! :D
Yeah... I don't know how I should feel about it
thanks :)
Rainbowdash, because [AWESOME!!!](http://youtu.be/y-UtvYNWpSs) and because [MORE AWESOME!!!](http://youtu.be/AGg3u03JPfk) And because [this](http://youtu.be/WImRs-nWW48) and [this.](http://youtu.be/tOoY13bRGSI) Need I say more?
Well, I'm glad to be able to put a smile on someone's face. Keep on gaming and having a good good time for yourself and I shall tune in next time. :)
Speaking as a man, I literally cried when I saw this.
I don't think that's the same one, note the bands on the legs.  Given the location it's probably not represented on BugGuide.  I'm not familiar with them, according to Wikipedia (not the most reliable source) they're harmless though.
even though OP specifically wanted it to be stored on the device?
The fact that most UK officers are unarmed is one of the strangest things in modern policing. It's as much cultural as anything else I find, because there are many other forces with low gun crime levels that are armed as a matter of course.   I do wonder if opinion will ever tip towards arming UK officers, although I'm certain that the procurement, maintenance and training costs of arming UK officers would keep it out of the question for the next few years at the very least. 
###SO BRAVE
Um... what? Is there an inside joke that Im not getting?
Hi there, I'm sure this will be buried at this point, but here goes anyways.  Thanks for the AMA and I have one question that I have been dying to find out ever since I first watched your movie prop collection videos on Youtube.  Where did you get the Fifth Element element stone props?  I'm assuming you made them yourself?  It has been my favorite science fiction movie for a decade now, and I would love to have something like that myself.  Thanks again.  I love your show!
it's a moronic statement yes, but not as moronic as believing in god.
Why are your explosions so awesome?
Honestly, if you are inactive, then maybe the resignation process is a formality you don't have to go through.  Although it is all up to you.  
=.= No, my sleeping and having relations with other males, as well as females, is what makes me 'not straight'...
So? Why is every truck owner so obsessed with how other people drive their trucks? My Dad has a 2010 Ford F-150 Lariat, and he manages a branch of a uniform retailer. He has a truck because he likes driving trucks, and he takes his boat in and out of the water a few times a year. Stop being such a truck hipster.
Felt sorry for him, actually, having to commit for that.
Question: Why do you hang around this place?
Rarely do I play A,A. Because some dork out there (RL or OL) thinks their 7,2 OS will win and 7,2,K,9,4 usually comes out when I have A,A. Been playing poker years. I've yet to win with A,A.  Though, I had 2,2 once on Big Blind. Flop was 2,K,2. I raised, everyone folded except someone who re-raised me. (You guessed it, He held K,K) and, well.... it's not much to brag about but I sort of liquidated 800 bucks from that guy in that hand. (1600 dollar pot) he was slightly pissed.   How many hands did I win that night at the casino?. . . . . . . . . 2. The first was a 10,10 and flop had a 10 in it. beat out two pair, shrugged it off, took that small pot of 100.   But........ A,A is getting over-rated. No one plays poker WELL these days to make such a powerful pair seem attractive any longer. My immediate reaction to it is (Imagine you're reading this on the Condescending Wonka Image Macro), "Oh? You got A,A. What was the flop?"  Anywho, yes, you can't be seen whilst playing OL poker. Good realization! Have an upvote!
There would be no stopping me. I would order perogies, cake, chocolate bars, a thanksgiving meal, and more stuff that I cannot think of. Then, assuming we are talking about execution being the mode of death, I would be too fat to be hanged, or fit in the electric chair. 
I've never tried it.  I prefer long aged dark rum.  I have bought a flagon of Kraken, which is ok, but spiced rum isn't my thing and I am very susceptible to headaches from cheaper rum.  Honestly, Appleton would be my go-to for anyone who doesn't know rum.  As Glen Livet is the scotch for people that don't drink scotch, so to I think Appleton is the Rum for the non-rum-drinker.
What? This has absolutely nothing whatsoever to do with freedom of speech! Are you nuts?
You missed 'spurt' going diagonally up and left, ending in the 't' on the top row, second column.
Upvote so the rational posts like this one can make it past the retarded jokes.
Most uk unions do this actually, I've been to loads
Yeah, potato v. tortilla. It ultimately boils down to personal preference. Apples and oranges are both fruits. Why not just eat an apple if you like oranges or vice versa? Because they are both distinct and appeal to different people for different reasons.
I still don't want to become full vamp.  I want to be able to die and I want to die human.
99,809,526,000,000 for those wondering
To me wearing them on the shoulder looks better (unless you're wearing it for practical reasons like you're at a festival), because occasionally I've seen across the body look pretty terrible where it can sort of cut between your breasts and it somehow makes tops look a bit weird. On the shoulder looks more casual, maybe a bit cooler.
Living in Canada it was pretty dumb of me never to wear a hat since it would flatten my hair.
I use Well of Blood and find it really useful for ally support, but I also have the trait that makes wells use ground targeting (and I haven't had much trouble with people not standing in my wells--I've actually been pleasantly surprised on that count, so this may be a YMMV thing).  
There was a [recent post](http://gw.reddit.com/r/LifeProTips/comments/yu1gy/success_fruit_fly_massacre_using_vinegar_and/) about this on reddit claiming that an open container of mad dog 20/20 worked like a charm where nothing else would.
PC or console? If you are on the PC there are console commands to resurrect dead NPCs. Console, try reloading some old saves.  
This is awesome.  I read an article about doing this a while back.  If I am not mistaken, the "stone" background is Styrofoam right?  Please correct me if I'm wrong.   
Thanks.  I personally wear doc martins, which have leather tops.  The last pair I had lasted me 3.5 years of daily use before the sole completely died, so I have high hopes for this pair.
As a mother, I agree that they are two different types of loves entirely. You really can't compare the two. But if there was a horrible accident and I had to pick between saving my fiance or daughter I'd pick my daughter. Because I know my fiance would want me to choose her as well.  (Consider the fact that your children are for life, and there's a much less likely chance that your SO will be around in 8 years.)
Terminal Velocity
Chicken stir-fry with the Elixer of Life to drink.
told my mom to put lightning bolts on the side of my head with clippers. oh yeah. im white
...Blakely?
nice explanation. it used to be insanely hard to win vs a team that gets the early 2 towers in the safe lane. people just used to do the same on their side. now hopefully more people will contest it!
You are filthy rich. You shouldn't be worrying.  Anyways your commute would likely be into the city on an express bus then one quick one up to the west side of lake union. Wouldn't be too bad.
So, the surplus isn't as much as the video makes it out to be? If that's the case, doesn't that mean that the bees that are kept on farms will die off every winter?
That zone blocking us killing him bad and it doesn't help that the raiders are always down a couple touchdowns, so he can never really get started.
[this post has been linked to by r/ShitRedditSays](http://www.reddit.com/r/ShitRedditSays+none/comments/10qfna/hey_youre_thinking_about_suicide_you_fucking/)
This is exactly what I was looking for.  Thank you
I don't see any bacon anywhere. I have lost interest.
I feel bad for laughing at the Hartley gif.  He looks comically upset...
Hahaha "Hello Jonas" . They obviously mixed up 2 tickets . 
I know the pain of taking your first gender studies class in university, and having a 'what about teh menz' professor, it's horrible. I enjoyed my second gender studies class though, it can be a lot of fun.  (In a way) what could be a more rewarding college experience than getting an upholder of the patriarchy fired from academia? :D
Fair enough : )
Alright, you'll be amazed when you go, the Islands are truly a magical place. (sounds corny but for real)
In the same boat.  Haven't got to the 'sowing of wild oats' part but... it cant wait. I've been offered a FWB-type deal but kind of hesitant. She seems a little *too* into it... if you get what I mean?
Here's a response I made to another redditor looking to develop his Ne and resolve his issues with social anxiety.  &gt;Studying all of your functions overall and seeing how you apply them in everyday life is the best way of developing any of them. &gt; &gt;For social situations specifically, you need to identify what your weakness is, how you react in those situations and how you can stop yourself from having that instinctive response. Not all INFPs have trouble with socializing for the same reason. &gt; &gt;If underdeveloped Ne is really your problem, the best way to develop it is to rely on it. Like muscles, functions don't get stronger if you don't use them. As your dominant function and source of comfort is Fi, your compulsion is to stay within the confines of the "firewall" that your Fi puts between you and the world. &gt; &gt;Normally most things don't enter your perception for analysis (Ne) without being evaluated and judged (Fi) even if these judgements are minor or even unnoticeable (your dominant function is the hardest to notice in your cognition because it is the most natural.) Your Ne can neither function without this filter, nor function at its fullest potential if this filter is too strong. &gt; &gt;You'll notice that ENFPs with dominant Ne and auxiliary Fi usually have no problem with social interaction because they evaluate nearly everything after they experience it, not before. They don't get caught up in pre-emptive and defensive evaluations during conversation because these have no real place in spontaneous socializing. The more you use your Fi, the less you'll use your Ne and the less you'll develop it. Both are active at all times, but one can heavily outweigh the other. Your goal is to allow that balance to tip in the other direction if necessary. At the same time, don't aim to shun or treat your Fi as a weakness. It is your biggest strength and there are many social narratives where it can be applied. If you have strong opinions about something, speak your mind. That in itself is a good way to make use of your Ne and Fi in a balanced way. Your Ne is your loudspeaker for your Fi and Te after all. &gt; &gt;INFPs can turn into bunkers of judgement where they can sit and evaluate things without actually involving themselves in the world; lest they risk letting people they have not approved into their bunker. The worst case scenario of this is the Fi-Si tertiary loop where their external functions shut off almost entirely and their personality resembles a turtle that has gone into its shell. &gt; &gt;They have to realize three things. &gt; &gt;1. It's impossible to only ever interact with people you have personally "approved" of. Sometimes you just need to take in the world as it comes, not on your own terms. You've conditioned yourself to view this as a threat when it isn't. &gt;2. It's equally impossible to judge everyone in a crowd without wearing yourself out. Don't view crowds as a ton of individual people, but as one singular entity from which you can pull individuals out of. &gt;3. Raw, unfiltered social interaction is only tiresome to the person who is trying to constantly deflect and filter it. If socializing is wearing you out then it's because you're going about it on the path of most resistance. &gt; &gt;Basically you'll have to force yourself to do things that feel both unnatural and uncomfortable for a while. Keeping in mind that it's for the greater good and that succumbing to the comfort of your dominant Fi will only ever be a short term solution. Like any learned skill, eventually it will become natural and a part of you. You're rewriting your subconscious thought (the bulk of your mind) through elaborate and repetitive rehearsal of conscious thought (the outer shell of your mind) and that kind of thing takes effort and time. &gt; &gt;Another problem Fi dominance can bring to socializing is that it centers heavily around identity. Many INFPs believe that if they become social people then they will have to abandon who they were before entirely (because most social people they have observed don't appear to have much of a reclusive side.) This isn't true. Having the ability to be social and outgoing doesn't take away your ability to do the exact opposite. It just puts more control of your actions into your own hands, not your subconscious. &gt; &gt;Hope this helps.  Also, when it comes to not making impulsive Fi based actions, you'll find that developing your Te will benefit you more in that area. Ne is not involved in making decisions, only seeing what decisions you can potentially make. Fi and Te are the two ends of your judgmental scale, so if one is weaker than the other then you won't make rational balanced decisions as well.  The thing is that everyone is both introverted and extraverted. If an INFP is having trouble acting the way an extravert would, the best way for him to learn is to simply fake it and learn by experience.  Doing so does not make him/her an extravert though. Their introversion is the product of preference, not behavior. Nothing short of massive psychological trauma can change that preference. It can however have a lesser grasp over them and how they choose to act. If they learn how to comfortably be more outgoing and upbeat, they don't cease to be INFPs. They simply gain the ability to be outgoing if they so choose.
You could also raise the COT by running a fuel line from the lower tanks to the orbiter and staging its engine to start along with the two jets.
Pkmn Platinum is the only one that is unavailable.
Thank you!
...be able to help* 
Your post led me to this: [Doom on the ZX Spectrum](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3v7cFGneuaw&amp;feature=related).
Need more info.  Error messages, OS type, etc.
Are you sure about that? I have heard that once the sun rises or sets in one place, it just goes and does the same thing at another place. For example, it will set in Chicago about an hour after it sets in New York, and a couple hours after that, it can be seen setting in San Francisco. I'm sorry to be the one to tell you this, but the sun is not faithful to you. When you think she's gone asleep for the night, she's actually showing her goods to other men around the world.
This sketch, her sketch with David Tennant ('ummmmmm excuse me....can I axe you a question???' ), and her time as Donna Noble is some of my favorite work. I love Catherine Tate and was so sad to see her leave as a companion 
I went in October, left from Los Angeles and went up to Canada and back. It was cold and it required more clothing than it would have in the summer. It also got dark early and my own personal rule of not riding an overloaded dirt bike at night on unfamiliar roads made the trip longer than it could have been. I also was lazy and didn't get on the road until 9-10am some mornings.  My only real advise is to take more pictures. I didn't take enough. And take pictures that are not just the bike parked in front of something.  
Hey, this reminds me of me! All the time. .
Lol. Love the internet Alpha male routine. Go play CoD. 
You don't need to watch the shows in any particular order... but eventually people get curious enough to watch every single one, only because you need to fill in holes when it comes to references that are made, and the somewhat sketchy ongoing plot development.  I would say start with picking from among the recent episodes (since 2005). There's a big list [here](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_doctor_who_serials), and you can find them all on Netflix.
and loosly based on a true story of two little sisters who went missing whilst looking for an adventure of their own in their new neighbourhood and were found drowned in a lake.
where is this? edit: [found it](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Bn09g1bwgDc&amp;feature=plcp)
Hours of drawing this just for karma
I think a lot of people come and leave when they see no one there. Sometimes you just got to risk it and stay to see if someone else comes in.   Otherwise, weekends are the best time for obvious reasons. 
im green with rage right now
thanks :)
Maraquan Stamp Set seems to be the #1 favourite for a new Stamp avatar.
Hey me and my roommate will be coming. It's our first time coming to one of these shindigs. How will we recognize you.
I met her last night after a performance. This is 100% who she is. I am over the top in love. I did my best to talk her into moving to Seattle so that I can see her ALLLLLL the time. She is honestly so gracious and kind and REAL that you just want to be around her. Because of her, I was able to talk a friend who has severe social anxiety about her weight into coming out. Then her big girl friend came. Then another larger friend who's in a wheelchair. In the end, there were 9 of us. Latrice is an inspiration. 
i tried it on my nipple once, it took the hair right off but made my nipple red and burn a bit because it wasnt washed off properly..
Well it is a picture... Haha lesson learned
Please do take the test before its too late, even though it was a miscarriage the last time, who knows you might get pregnant. This because as you told vampires can't get humans pregnant (or something of the sort) but it sill did happen.... Please take the test, better safe than sorry...
You *would* make me remember Planethalflife, you magnificent bastard.
i sent to jesus@heaven.com
I don't consider it as much "Ugly" as I would think of it as "Intimidating".   The A-10 personified would be one of those guys who are 5'7" tall and 5'7" wide, who can benchpress a WV Beetle, who still likes to run a marathon every now and then. You know that although he looks rather ... different he definitely is not someone you want to annoy.
Are you retarded? Why would it display his own name on his phone? Jason is texting Alex. Alexandra.
And fuck the dieticians, those bastards be lyin'.
duuuuude... i can't quite believe what is happening right now. so crazy. speechless. love this team. fjeialkjleadfscvx,a.
you're getting a little bit too much pleasure from that.
Im on the football team at school no joke made varsity and its amazing everyone is really amazed and then there are those dumbasses that call me a chode, lesbian etc so i keep a thick head skin and continue with life!
I think you don't know a fuck about the beta.  Blizzard wants to make mech viable in TvP, but since the only anti air that terrans have when they go mech are vikings, protoss just go full air and storm on the vikings. Terran has to go full vikings when they go mech or they just die, and when they go full vikings, they have no ground army and vikings get destroyed by storms. So mech isn't viable at the moment because of the lack of AA.
I'm honestly feeling 51/49 in favor of ripping off a drug dealer would be more fun than playing with a dildo. 
Where's the code?
The kool-aid description made it sound like I was drinking over processed orange powder with water added to it.
Epic choke is the best description (someone on r/golf said they should have selected Heimlich for their team!). From 10-6 up to lose 14.5 - 13.5 has to be a shocker for the Yanks. Of the 5 matches that got to the 18th, USA could only get one point. Really thrilling by the European team.
They said that going into the Pocket dimension would get rid of Monster zoo rewards.  But telling others is never a bad thing, especially when nothing else is being said here.
he must be white or american. oh wait there's a roach in it. they don't roll with roaches in america BITCH!
watching it made me sleepy
You can do it, I believe in you :)
I love Sinn Sage.
I'm in too.
bonehunter belt and twinblade for 3 commons?
Nty
cool
Visted for the golems, stayed for the music.  All PvP and WvW videoes should be made with 80's movie music. Push It to the Limit would a great one too.
So you're suggesting that we pay contractors money to do what military does already? You know ends up happening? They end up getting paid 3x as much as US military and they end up being US citizens anyway. 
I am made fun of for my like of candy corn...  Mostly, because I will eat it with salted penuts. Mostly.
Ditto.
My Tai Kwon Do teacher told a story of his teacher getting in a bike accident and automatically tucking into a shoulder roll as soon as his body left the bike. He ended up tumbling his way across the intersection, getting up, dusting himself off, and waiting for the police to arrive on the curb. When the paramedics got there they exited the ambulance with a body bag and their jaws dropped when they saw him sitting there, just fine, except for some severe bruising.
I wish more people would read and understand this.
[](/party) Well, I feel I should give you the [customary welcome gif](http://i.imgur.com/1o9uX.gif).  Don't worry about this post getting downvoted - this sub just doesn't like grimdark stuff much. It's better suited to /r/mlpmature really.
This is why we can't have nice things.
Give us the link! Give us the link! Give us the link!
&gt;Cleaning the house half naked  When it gets hot in summer, as SOON as I get home I throw off the work clothes and the wardrobe becomes a tank top and skivvies.   Try doing that when the Boy Scout Troop is over for a slumber party.
Fire Island is an island off the coast of New York's Long Island that has a tourism-based seasonal economy with heavy catering to the LGBT community.
I can't bring myself to watch The Land Before Time ever since I found out what happened to the little girl who voiced Ducky.
Electric razors usually do the trick for me. 
Exactly. The Church of LDS obviously has a significant amount of members and needs some level of administration to oversee the different temples (?) and associated organizations. Also I believe the building on the right is a Canadian government building in Ottawa, but I could be mistaken.
Listen, this happens to everyone...don't be surprised if it eventually happens to you.  The best way to get over it is to disconnect from the person, such as your wife is doing.
Yeah I went to high school with 2 of the guys at a Gamestop down the road. I never buy stuff there but they I like to come hang out.  They don't like the idea of trying to sell people crap just as much as the next guy, but it's part of their job. Sometimes you just gotta pay the bills, something some people don't get.
 so we would still be allowed to call muslims frauds, womanizers and child molesters...just dont call the prophet those things?
laugh out loud at "man jewels". sigh
I try to be extra polite to janitors/lunch ladies at my high school. Teachers too. Spending all day with shitty teenagers has got to get old, so I reckon being nice could go a long way for some people. 
did you write 2 in place for 'to'?  *whispers* you're on **reddit** man! run for your life!
I really wanna play this now.
Hmmm. Well, I suppose that depends strongly on how you measure returns.   But that strikes me as very flawed reasoning in regards to the 100 rep bench comp.  Training stength for a test of conditioning and endurance is not going to be as effective as training conditioning and endurance.  Strength does confer more endurance at lower weights, but not to that degree generally speaking.
I have removed your submission as the source resolution is actually 500x500. Please resubmit with the proper one listed.
Because they don't want to fight each other, they've both publicly stated it.
Liberal Fascism. Read it and then tell me if you think you're "Liberal"...
You're currently sitting at -1, but I don't know why. Midnight is 12 AM, and noon is 12 M. It is technically correct to say that there is no such time as 12 PM. That would be like saying that noon is in the afternoon.
Don't sell yourself short. I'm in my mid-30s and while I don't think I'm unattractive I'm certainly no Hollywood star. I currently have two girlfriends and two sex friends. I went on a date with a new woman last week and will again this week. I tell all the women I meet that I only want a casual relationship, and it works for them.   You just have to put yourself out there and try. I actually think it's easier now than it has been - the men of this generation are kind of lame. No offense to any guy reading, but look how many women are here with us in this subreddit, then go browse r/sex and see how many women are frustrated because their guy spends more time playing video games/on the internet/masturbating to porn than he does with her.  So competition is at an all-time low. Go out there and find someone you can have regular sex with. Thank your wife for giving you this option, where most of our partners wouldn't even consider it. Good luck! 
UGLY!
The movie is coming out on the 26th. It looks amazing. 
I really don't like listening to music at all.  I listen to audiobooks and podcasts. 
My experience as a woman is that most men do not.  As a woman, I like trimmed but not shaven.   Shaven on a man looks creepy and gross to me for some reason.  It might be hot as a one time "let's try this" kind of thing, but all of the time: no.  I also STRONGLY dislike when men shave/wax/trim chest hair, or at least to the point where it is bare/smooth.  
Notfunnybro
Hey, don't blame *us* because your bf's retarded.
Just because doctors can't refute it, doesn't make it true.
As far as I know we don't *'have'* any. We buy it from others.
http://i.imgur.com/SYB9v.jpg  Hope you will like it =) .
Haha, neither am I. 
Best set I've seen yet. Perfect. Any more of her?
Try telling them that you will be deducting it from next months rent. Give them copies of receipts to clearly demonstrate your expenses with a spreadsheet clearly itemizing the deductions (including the 1/30th of rent for the day you didn't live there).  Give them a copy of the lease and highlight the violations they committed as well as include a document that summarizes their violations.   Send it to them certified mail.  Then when you give them the rent check write in the memo section rent $X - expenses $Y = $Z net.   Make sure you include a copy of the documents you sent them (documents listed above) with rent check.  I'd send it certified mail as well, and I'd make sure that they RECEIEVED it at least 1 week before the rent due date.
Still waiting for my pre-order Carpenter to come in. :(
Defrauding an agent is equivalent to defrauding the principal.  Please explain otherwise.
I know it is not exact, but I always 1/3 for 30%.  I like your way better.
With the alphabet in it for good measure?
I don't think that would translate well to a BLT, but maybe.
cool.
Anyone seeking more info might also check here:  title | comnts | points | age | /r/ :--|:--|:--|:--|:-- [Hey, this looks like my spot!](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/xkvih/hey_this_looks_like_my_spot/) | 2^coms | 18^pts | 1^mo | funny [Zero fucks given](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/rnvpn/zero_fucks_given/) | 55^coms | 860^pts | 6^mos | funny [My cat always does this !!!](http://www.reddit.com/r/aww/comments/ngiho/my_cat_always_does_this/) | 87^coms | 759^pts | 9^mos | aww [Damn cat...](http://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/109nr9/damn_cat/) | 2^coms | 18^pts | 9^dys | pics [No, human. That's enough computer for now. It's time to play with me](http://www.reddit.com/r/gifs/comments/zywyz/no_human_thats_enough_computer_for_now_its_time/) | 80^coms | 1309^pts | 14^dys | gifs [The most comfortable place in the house](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/ogott/the_most_comfortable_place_in_the_house/) | 190^coms | 1011^pts | 8^mos | funny [Cats love keyboards](http://www.reddit.com/r/gifs/comments/nefvd/cats_love_keyboards/) | 7^coms | 51^pts | 9^mos | gifs [Is this how Reddit works?](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/nd7i5/is_this_how_reddit_works/) | 9^coms | 20^pts | 9^mos | funny [No. Stop. You're done. Your time on the internet is over. [GIF]](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/lb9b9/no_stop_youre_done_your_time_on_the_internet_is/) | 14^coms | 50^pts | 11^mos | funny ["oh you're doing something important? well, im just gonna sit riiiight...here."](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/kwg4r/oh_youre_doing_something_important_well_im_just/) | 35^coms | 321^pts | 1^yr | funny [The easier statistic would be to find the number of people on reddit this hasn't happened to](http://www.reddit.com/r/gifs/comments/jv21s/the_easier_statistic_would_be_to_find_the_number/) | 21^coms | 108^pts | 1^yr | gifs [There is no place like right here.](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/jhw6c/there_is_no_place_like_right_here/) | 3^coms | 22^pts | 1^yr | funny  *[source: karmadecay](http://karmadecay.com/i.imgur.com/r5AWI.jpg)*
Couldn't agree more that you shouldn't usually get them.  Also remember that many (most?) credit cards already increase a warranty if you buy with them.
I found [a picture of the engine bay](http://i.imgur.com/VqufC.jpg).
Wha- what is it? 
Goddamn I thought I was the only one!
A lot of people overlook that FOE is as much a Fallout fanfic as it is a ponyfic. It has elements inspired from FO1/2 and FO3/NV. I was only familiar with FO3/NV when I read it and only later learned how much I had missed by not having played 1 or 2.
Chaox just got served by Aphro on the #11 TSM Invitationals.  http://www.solomid.net/brackets
Cassel is THE worst starting qb in the NFL, hands down.  I'd take tebow over cassel.
I got bored of my old Desktop, so I decided to change it up last night. (Old: http://imgur.com/Mjo3U)  Skins: Wallpaper- http://imgur.com/UdQGr  Windows Theme- http://zainadeel.deviantart.com/art/Shine-2-0-for-Windows-7-172671190  Start Orbs- http://binarycolour.deviantart.com/art/Simplistic-Start-Orb-172629711   Change Start Orb with- http://kishan-bagaria.deviantart.com/art/Windows-7-Start-Orb-Changer-v5-153001999  Explorer Icons- http://tiheum.deviantart.com/art/Faenza-Icons-173323228 (not shown)  Clock and System Monitor- http://rasylver.deviantart.com/art/Flip-Clock-v1-3-154070267  Top Bar- http://browse.deviantart.com/?qh=&amp;section=&amp;q=Enigma#/d1ptasn  Launcher- http://danieliop.deviantart.com/art/Simple-RM-Launcher-216478809  Edit- To make icons on taskbar in the middle- http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=z6I9nSmYmEw  Edit2- I found some mirror's edge start orbs, but for some reason my computer is being a bitch and whenever I try to change my start orb an error message comes up. Help? (ME start orbs- http://fav.me/d566kha)  Edit3- Gave the wrong link for one thing. Thanks to ibtbwb for pointing this out.
This. http://www.imgur.com/Y0z1H.jpeg
Orlando.
Does anyone else find it funny how Fox News aka "execute everyone, bomb the shit out of every damn country" treats their viewers like innocent, little children that should shield their eyes, when the death they are seemingly so detached from is in her face?
that is a totally valid criticism.  If I were saddleback I would be pissed, but I'm not and its not a terrible business plan
Lelouch
I hope so! I've never made it before but it sounds amazing. 
I've actually been once to scotland. Funny story. We were fishing on an Faroese autoline ship in rockall bank, and then the cpt. had read the map wrong and put 20 rows of line into some closed area and then 24h later, the scottish coast guard came and busted us. Then we headed to Ullapool and had to drop anchor just half a mile outside the docks. Then we weren't allowed to go to shore for like 3 days due to some politics and we had to tell them we were running out of food and water before we could tie up the boat
4chan.
It will be interesting to see how TJ's does here. They certainly have some hefty balls opening a location in the same plaza as the Wegman's superstore.
Transubstantibacon.
Okay, thank you so much. I've decided if I notice anything abnormal from now on I will immediately tell my parents. Thanks for the help, and if it does happen again I won't even hesitate to go to a doctor. Again, thanks.
A friend is caring for a similarly paralyzed stray which had been hit by a car. It's slightly better, a lot happier and caught a mole the other day :)
When I was in 4th grade I thought it was cool to spit every minute or two until people started making fun of me for it
Ok it is fixed. Even though I deleted my corp exchange account Exchange Services was still using 50% of the cpu. I added the account back and miracle of miracles Exchange Services is now down to 5% of usage.  Weird.
Woah, fuck, gaol is pronounced the same as jail??
I did not.  And to be honest, I don't believe you.
Even Obama is against civil liberties.  He is the #1 pusher of the so-called Patriot act.
I'm guessing gonewild?
When I started, When I played bronze, I got the basic Packs. When I played silver I got the 'silver packs' (worth 20k credits I forget what they're called), then I read here in this sub-reddit, that One guy only bought SPs and SPS, and nothing else.  Since then, that's all i've bought and I have everything up to rares maxed and all URs.   Now, i'll concentrate on consumables and the occasional PSP. I usually purchase the JEP or packs for that. 
That will last longer than a bouquet of flowers!
Jaime would destroy Ned. No contest. Barristan Selmy, who served alongside some really impressive knights in the Kingsguard, calls Jaime the best natural swordsman he'd ever seen. Says it all. 
I'm not really surprised redditors were eager for approval as children.
[Karmadecay](http://karmadecay.com/i.imgur.com/p6YAh.jpg)... though I hadn't seen this before.
I regret watching this
Well, OP didn't say who's giving and who's getting...
Just give vendors a few months to retrofit their machines, it's a cost saving measure, it just takes everyone a little while to catch up.  The same argument was made when we got loonies in the first place.
They are very dear to my cock......er, I mean my heart. 
My apologies: I forgot the disclaimer which conveys that my silly jokes do not reflect my actual views. Carry on.
/internet hugz/
Roll brown. I've cant recall a time Bradshaw had done stellar numbers (doesn't mean it hasn't happened). He's shown he can get 25 in my 1 ppr league. If you need a bold move I say that's it
why does everyone use this picture to point out reply?
she shoulda just killed her boss then her self
Thank you, I book marked it for future reference.
http://bossip.com/529596/recession-is-real-thousands-of-people-standing-in-line-for-job-during-10-degree-weather-in-chicago-video69691/   It happens all the time. People want to work you know. 
The problem with creating figures on this scale is that the sculptor has to be *really* accomplished to: 1) create a reasonable likeness of a real, living person and (2) be able to anticipate how the production process will distort the result. Most action figure sculpts use material which shrinks during production, so producing a very lifelike representation of a person means that the sculptor *has to add extra material to the accurate sculpt of a person*. Essentially, it would be like adding 10 lbs. to the character, including in unexpected spots like the nose.  That's why it's so difficult to find a really good sculpt of a person in action figure form.
Exactly, I would buy it if it were closer to the $75 tier, but can't now that the funding period has passed.  Also those synth samples/presets would definitely sweeten the deal.
Come now, that's such a bad pun.
&gt; Of course I understand that they had to change the plot in the middle of the series  Why did they "have to"? Was it because of the leak? Or due to Karpyshyn leaving? Either way, it makes no sense, they weren't obligated to make entirely new story.
Yes.
? How would I not be sure? Would you mind explaining how the disportionate attention given to Jill's case is indicative of how these cases are reported equally?
Yes, Fewdio is just a bunch of horror/thriller short films. I know one of the directors/editors.
I'm afraid it's true; pooping with the door open is a proven gateway to the hard drugs.
it's a real life representation of reddit
actually he modified altair's version to prevent losing the finger. altair's versionw as the orginal version. i've read the book and played the game, I KNOW ALL
no its not! D:
Yeah, no joke. This was a few years ago, back when the only "known" food issues were shellfish and peanuts.  (What's interesting is the peanut-craze makes me a bit mad. Growing up parents of my friends were freaking the fuck out about peanuts to the point where peanuts were banned from school, no reese's cups for birthdays, that sort of thing. Everyone brought cupcakes and shit though and no one but me cared about that.  The reason it makes me mad is that recent science has shown that the old way of doing the allergen test specifically for peanuts had a 90%+ false positive rate, and a lot of parents didn't even bother getting an allergy test in the first place. In other words, most people who say they have peanut allergies really don't.)
Agreed.
He's probably doing it because you're getting pissed off.
[spoiler](/s "At least the Doctor can tell Brian that Amy and Rory got to live full, happy lives together but still are already dead due to time travel shenanigans.  Much better than having to tell him that they just straight-up got killed during an adventure like I was worried would happen.")
Apprently silverlight 5 does not work in chrome on mac os. :( But this post may fix the issue   http://productforums.google.com/forum/#!topic/chrome/336y-ROVvdg  Here is the supported requirements for silverlight.  http://www.microsoft.com/getsilverlight/get-started/install/default.aspx?reason=unsupportedbrowser#
One thing never changes, I can never figure out what the fuck 90% of death metal band logos say.
Awesome! I'll be heading to the bookstore soon.
http://www.supermarketi.info/index.php?mod=novosti&amp;nid=446
So when is this going to take effect? There's an owner in my league who hasn't even logged in since being invited in the league (no lineup setting, no draft), and hasn't been replaced.  I contacted my commish a week or two ago, and this inactive owner still hasn't been replaced.  Shame, since this inactive owner actually started 3-0 (though will lose this week due to a couple of bye players in the starting lineup).  (P.S. - There's another owner who I just noticed hadn't logged in in the past 3 weeks, and while I haven't notified my commish, he's still there as well.)
Actually, now there's no microphone found at all. Even when i restarted.
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=qGQAQSUTcns
By golly, you've been smooze'd!
It could probably happen if the leaders of most of these Islamic countries weren't so corrupt... They're more than happy to leave their populace uneducated and festering in their own backwards idea of "religion", since it means they can stay in power and have better control over them. With the recent Arab spring maybe this could change for the better.. provided the new people in charge don't try to further immerse themselves in religion, but instead focus on improvements in technology and science. Ultimately making the goal to better people's lives, instead of to better their religion. 
I've been trying to change my language ever since I saw this one post on here a few weeks back (can't remember). But instead of "not giving his wife an orgasm" I would say "his wife not having an orgasm" which takes sex out of the realm of male sexual dominance e.g. we presume that he has an orgasm every time he has sex (see: patriarchy). But then again in this context he is writing very much within the patriarchal values system and I could see that you would construct your sentence that way in response.
your wizard came in yesterday by the way.
GOD BLESS AMERICA.
No, that doesn't mean it at all. Certain foods were unclean. It doesn't mean that those animals were inherently sinful. It just means they were ceremonially unclean. It has nothing to do with sex being sinful, it has to do with being different then the rest of the world.
Chauvinism 101
Even if i put all the flowers in the world all around you..you would be definitely the most beautiful one
It's called a stock. And yes, you usually should, but that's for accuracy. She's clearly just emptying the gun here, so hipfire is acceptable.
With a team like that, I'm really surprised at 0-4, much less 0-16. Good game.
*hugs* I'm sorry love, I understand what you're going through. Keeping yourself occupied might help. In your free time, take a walk or start cleaning, as boring as it sounds. It fills up your mind with something to do. Just remember that it's not going to be this way forever. Things really do get better. Every single person on this Earth has some value, and that includes you.
How does one go about shaving ones balls? I trim the top but I never touch the scrotum out of fear
are you positive it was under five mins?
same thing... *basically*
What difference do sales make?  This is a criticism of quality and of their failures in listening to the community, not of the game's ability to profit them as a business.   Or does satisfying the consumer mean nothing as long as you get the sales?  DICE/EA may not care what we think, that doesn't mean we shouldn't say anything.
I actually had a guy in Freshman year of high school offer to buy my retainer from me. He was going to give me $50. I decided it was a go and promptly lost my retainer before I could sell it. When I got a new one and asked if he still wanted to buy it, he suddenly didn't need one any more. Then he avoided me all the time.  Just now, its all becoming clear.
SEEMS LEGIT
Adrian Veidt motivated me more. 
You're welcome! I went to Goodwill, 2 CVSs and a Rite Aid and all were out (this was a couple hours after I got mine). Oh well. The cheapest capsules I've found are at Bed Bath &amp; Beyond because I often get their coupons in the mail. Otherwise, the next cheapest are ones they sell at Coffee Bean stores for 60¢ each (10 for $6)
The caller from skyrim. No problem here.
Tried it with my little belly. So much fun.
Are you from the Faroe Islands?
..I do.
BIT.TRIP BEAT for WTF?
I just do not want to be in HEAVEN, if they are going!  It would be HELL to me.
stoic 
My guess is it would be ok. It is alcohol, so it should kill anything it'd need to kill bacteria wise. Alcohol stops aging after it is open. But, google it. Everyone knows what is on Google is true...
Call me maybe.  You know it works. ;)
You need moisturizer for dehydrated skin.  Personally, my secret tip is using Alpha Keri oil after I get out of the shower. You MUST apply it to wet skin, then just gently dab it off. It's great and super cheap:  http://www.walgreens.com/store/c/walgreens-shower-%26-bath-oil/ID=prod4130119-product  It's used as a bath oil though so make sure you check in the right section of drugstore. 
Aww... here, have an upvote. And a cookie. And another cookie. And one more. I said ONE more. What are you doing? You fat fuck! Give those back!!! Look at yourself! Disgusting. Get some self-control.
And seriously, you should read it.
He obviously wasn't from Aberdeen then. 
And you can turn it off, geniuzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzz
I'm with the guild, can we work something out? (350 gold)
Anything. I said it!
sent.  also delete your email so spammers dont get it
.jpg go home you are drunk
i just dont want to see the same series again is all
Yes, I love that one, beautiful, both of them.
Shit sonner or later your employer will be able to charge you for using the rest room using the break room
so the cat held the pose long enough for you to take a picture, or you sat there all night with a camera on your face just in case the cat were to make a silly face....I find both scenarios quite doubt able good sir. 
Devil's advocate: Willow didn't start off as a gay character.  It's easier to have a straight character that later comes out than to correctly introduce a non-hetero character initially.  By the time her sexual identity was changed to lesbian, she was a strong enough character in her own right to be "Willow, who now happens to be gay" instead of "gay Willow."
Is that Madonna?
Shave every few days in the hot shower, have never cut myself shaving.
His name is literally "Egg". Obviously, Martin was planning this reveal from the beginning.
Trusting a fart!
182!
hazukashii (恥ずかしい I think)  is to be embarrassed or ashamed. 
Thank you for the polite reply.  you: &gt; There's also the social aspect, where **being treated like a guy** just leaves a bitter taste in your mouth being segregated by gender depresses you because you had the misfortune to be born with a penis,  you: &gt; why nobody treats you like them.   These *appear* to logically imply you want to be "treated like a woman."  (Right?)  So, how do you want to be treated?  (Or not treated?) &gt; It's a discomfort in your own skin, and your brain looking at other girls your age with jealousy  Do you mean, jealousy of their beauty? . . .  
Yea. I think how I was 2 years ago right before I started watching DW, and i remember how my mind would just run wild, and my thoughts would become incredibly paranoid of my roommates and friends. I began avoiding them all, shutting myself in my room so I would not have to witness them talking about me. All of the thoughts in my head telling me to just do it, and get it over with. That they should feel bad for talking about me. It was too much. I agree, this episode is amazing, as is all Doctor Who minus one episode that I don't care for. It's beautiful. OH! I just remembered one other thing that has brought me to tears, and that is the Ood song of freedom. Yea, the only two things that have really caused me to feel sadness: The song, and the Vincent episode.
Just set up your own router anyway.  If anybody comes asking about it, feign ignorance.  They can't legally enter your room without giving you 24 hours notice.
Following in your bold footsteps, I also googled it. I suddenly got super disgusted by how many people were tweeting/commenting that they hope that (mis)quote means Justin Bieber is going to kill himself. That shit is fucked up... 
/puts a [cock]ring on it 
have you ever eaten so much you threw up cause there was too much food in your stomach?
Keep it, however, I kept mine because it came with a hammock...
Statistically, your friend is much more likely to rape you. Fyi 
What? I need to see this. Someone got a link?
"You spoony bard!" Tellah FFIV
Im interested and im a ucsb student
[Hey man, nice shot](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=o9mJ82x_l-E)
One word: JNCOs
man the fuck up
I don't really think you know what that means.
What were you and Jamie like as kids, did you blow lots of stuff up?
Arma 2 Co for both
Hi
Thanks for the new background!
Yea, watched them get beat by the yankees in the nosebleeds. Draft this guy.
It is very responsible for their popularity.
The Matthews photobomb toward the bottom of the page was hilarious.
of beer on the wall! 99 problems of beer! you take one down, pass it around, 98 problems of beer on the wall!
My first time in downtown Atlanta a homeless guy decided to escort me unasked to the Coca Cola factory which was within sight of my hotel, and another guy asked if I would trade shoes with him.
well yeah. They are old surplus. Back when the ussr fell the mosin flooded the market and the price for a basic surplus just crashed.
I did that with Mass Effect 3. Actually watched the *entire* game on Youtube because I didn't want to give EA $60.  I was honestly surprised some game review website put that up with EA's blessing.  I finally caved and got the game when it went on sale for $30. 
It has been 5 hours since this was posted... I expect that this was probably broken by now...  if not, you have beat my record.
Korean. For one thing, I think it's absolutely beautiful.  That, and I need to understand Lady Rainacorn.
As much as I love 1984, I can't finish We.  It's got great ideas, but bad writing.
Latest or tourney mode?
It's faded this way because it's extremely low contrast and the details are very small.  These both lead to poor fading. That's why the American Traditional style has survived for so long because the mantra is simple, bold, and high-contrast.  It's a nice little piece, but unfortunately I think touching it up aside from the general outline will just increase the muddiness.  EDIT:  That portion of the wrist seems to fade more than others as well.  Seems to have to do with how much that section of the wrist goes from being wrinkled to un-wrinkled, it blows out out the ink.  Not a tattoo artist here.
Not even on Wall Street.
Better off with a taser. A pocket knife won't do shit. 
Oh, hell yes. Michael Raymond-James. I hope he stays for a bit.
My only question is how do you have less than 200 miles? The day i got my bike+liscense i ran that fucker out of gas twice.
No, the bitarray contains only odd numbers; it's an optimization of the standard sieve to reduce storage by half, since only odd numbers can be prime (except 2, which the professor misses). A[0] refers to the number 3, A[1] refers to the number 5, and A[i] refers to the number 2*i+3. Thus, if j is a prime number then A[(j-3)/2] == 0.
Too bad your subject matter wasn't worth the time.
Funny, weird, sweet, cute, awkward, long haired. :) Lives 3 states away. :( 
Everything about this comment. To the point where I don't understand why people in college or younger even want to be in a relationship. That stuff's for married people. 
Where's a blog you wrote? I think you forgot the link.
hi
how do you feel about frilly toothpicks?
This.   don't shave, prickly hairs between your ass? no thanks.
yes.  Go into your backpack, click the gibus and the button "set style" will light up and you can choose between the 3 different styles
We need the creators to answer this question so that we can stop arguing about this. I say he's dead and that's what made the ending so "It's beautify -tear" 
Now she lives far away.
that shit can be murderously itchy.  Looks good, but so fucking itchy.
I think I got something in my teeth, could you get it out for me?  That's fucking teamwork.
What call gave it to the Packers?
Yeah, Teesside university had this too. I thought it was pretty common to be honest.
&gt;takling  &gt;tackling  http://i.imgur.com/XuKnq.jpg
Oh my god, I went to school with a kid who said that in like the fifth grade and it ruined his life. Shit followed him to senior year highschool at least. Kid was tormented about it by everyone, like, **bad**
Verified with the mods!
Countless at Guantanamo Bay? It's 166 exactly. This is well known. If you're talking about other places then okay, but the number has been decreasing for Guantanamo Bay.
My favorite commuter turbo-prop. I got to ride in one earlier this year (Alaska Airlines from Portland, OR). I've always liked them.
name it lvl 2 Pidgey
A lot more, now.
The one impersonating Jack Nicholson from The Shining is the very best one.
giants
Yep.  Thanks for the acid.  Got anymore?
Jebediah Kerman... I'll take it.
Would you rather drink a quart of cum or a glass of period blood?
I will say find a rommie first, have the person meet you in an open area interview the person. You can also do a background check online on that person. Request last landlord phone#as well. 
ah, I thought you meant how we let them score at will in the second half to blow the lead
Explore it and find it's secrets 
Do it. Hartline is in the same mold as Amendola in that he's actually a PPR machine. 
That girl has the exact same piercings as me. Neat. 
This used to be completely true, and while it still largely is, there are now many Iranian restaurants that serve authentic home cooked style meals.  Regarding the dishes suggested by _flac, don't think that because you have tried one, you have tried them all.  Fesenjoon and zereshk polo especially vary greatly in both ingredients, and range in flavor from tart to sweet.  Also each town has its own distinct kind of sweet desert that may be hard to find in other areas.
[How soon people forget. ](http://4.bp.blogspot.com/_2RIMmCYczdo/TGcWRhesDxI/AAAAAAAAA3Y/s8TbwM-Iwkk/s400/kid_n_play.jpg) 
I was unable to watch the game today due to a family reunion. After checking the score and recap, I just wanted to drop by and say HAIL YEA!!!!!
This is what happens when you eat pizza from the wrong side.
That more or less sums it up. It's not about good and bad, it's about what an individual human "desires". My point being that as long as we have the capacity to feel pain, or are wired up in a number of similar ways, we'll still desire things, that's not going to magically change.   I understand that the words and expectations will change their meanings in society, maybe getting a haircut will be considered relatively unpleasant, but that's not going to stop someone from enjoying sex or whathaveyou. 
The story.  The gameplay.  I hate most games. Probably just me.
[The sad truth about orange juice.] (http://www.cracked.com/article_19433_the-6-most-horrifying-lies-food-industry-feeding-you.html)
me too -_-
You are a beautiful human being. Your words are the prettiest I've heard in a while. 
Check Battery, Connections on Starter, Possible Since it's a camper it might have a Starter Solonoid like a Ford setup somewhere in the doghouse or fender.
Uh, one of mine is dicksauce... I was on the phone with dude and he was trying to get me to do something, for some reason he thought calling me dicksauce was going to do the trick...it didn't.
love me some bears! but i am a girl so they don't love me back :( 
one of the few times rapey can be used in proper context 
Apparently Random
I sincerely hope you find the time to vote against him. 
Does the DRAM light being continuously red mean anything? 
This was posted under the atheist forum with *your* title, "Calvin subtly demonstrating how religion works."  *You're* the one assigning religious subtexts to this strip, not Watterson.  This strip had nothing to do with religion, yet you insinuated that it did.  Clear enough forya, chum?
That's up there with the wedding plans my dad &amp; stepmom had, but were never able to get the funds together to actually perform.  The ceremony would start with my stepmom preparing to marry a mutual friend on a boat, when another ship would pull alongside with Dad and his other friends proceeding to board and "fight" the wedding party with sabres and cutlasses.  Eventually, it would come down to a duel between the grooms, which my father would win.  Then someone would hold a flintlock on the priest while my father married my stepmom and carted her back over to the other ship where the reception would be.  No, I never really grew up either.  My big wedding plan was "Victory of the Mad Scientist" - we were going to have it at a local Hackerspace.  The top end of the plan involved making the bride's father dress up in a gorilla suit with a fishbown helmet, finding someone to play the defeated hero, and vows that included the phrase "forsaking all others and making them rue the day".   Oh, and we were going to have a unity Tesla Coil.  That was the important part.
Jokes on you, I always click the images before reading the title. 
I'm just so happy I finally know how babies are made.
I believe ninite recommends non-free software.
This can be done using existing rail attachments.
No. It's indicative of the very problem we're discussing here.
E-mail is an anglicism; courriel / courrier électronique ಠ_ಠ
The games are still so much fun. You get to have so much power 
I teach about a half hour outside (west) of Boston and Framingham and Bridgewater are the two big ones where we all go for our masters programs.  
Apparently not because someone posted this joke 6 hours before OP as first day internet kid meme and it isn't even close to the front page.
Well wouldn't the snow reflect back a tiny portion of the light from the moon making the moon brighter, just not visibly so?
Maybe. To be fair, everyone going in wasn't going to make it past the angels. They probably didn't feel the need for a security system. 
Also add /r/NotaMethAddict  I still don't understand what they're doing there.
What  the  woof
Hey I saw you a couple weeks ago! 
:C
Awesome, I'm glad you picked up that Continuum cartridge.  Maybe you can let me borrow it sometime!
Perfectly literal
how the fuck was that given to us.
No, I don't know, explain it to me.
What do you use to anchor the hammock to the walls?
I've tried 6 of different kinds of salvia and not one time did I ever experience anything but extreme dizziness. It apparently works, but not for me.
the car is sweet, when the hell is the movie JINN coming out thought???
Sorry, typo. I'm not really the rebellious type.
This is absolutely correct.  I did allude to this when I said that it was a facebook picture that they probably didn't even see.  But I should have been more clear -- most of them were pissed off because their local cleric told them to be pissed off.  
They really are actually the department loved so much theese recordings they asked me to record these lectures for their future reference.
Elv and Tuk UI's are up to date from their official website, tukui.org
I think you nailed it. There was definitely a Xenogears demo out back then, and you started off in Lahan village and then traveled via a dirt path up to Citan's house, which had a telescope at the top.  pic: http://i404.photobucket.com/albums/pp125/GraphicsGoldMine/Xenogears%20complete%20maps/xenogearscitanshouse.jpg
Most presidents don't have anything that could be universally thought of "good for the country". A better thing that a president could hold is the country didn't fall apart. While that did happen in Obama's presidency, it is not his fault. It was mostly Bush's fault, and other things that couldn't be helped.
I cringed just reading it silently. 
its funny...cause its true
Don't you hate it when the fellows on the train don't even take the time to make it look nice? Seriously, it's called common courtesy.  EDIT: Spelling
that is such a beautiful dog. what a stud.
Thank you. This explains it perfectly.
As a first year MSW student, I realize every day that grad school is a joke.
It always makes me feel semi-normal when I come to these askreddit threads and see "oh, there's someone here who does this weird thing that I do. I'm not a complete freak".  Of course, my secret word is only valid for time travel back until I'm 15, when I made it up. If I have to visit my past self at any time past that age, I'm probably going to have to go with details of imaginary friends or something.
It sounds like an allergic reaction. Stop using the new products for a week or so and see if the itchy patches go away.   Once they do, gradually reintroduce one product at a time to see which one is the culprit. That is, start using the cleansing gel again for a few days and see if you get a reaction. If not, add the toner back into your routine and see if that's the one giving you the reaction. And so on.  Once you figure out which product it is, take note of its ingredients. If you ever get a reaction to another product, you can cross-reference its ingredients with whichever Dermalogica product is the problem. That way, you'll start to narrow down which particular ingredient is causing the problem.
Considering that GRRM has gone on the record and said that he's purposely limiting the presence of magic because he think's it can be corrosive to the plot/setting/tone/etc...
WAY TO GO, HAVE A COOKIE. 
It was kind of an ass-backwards way.  We sort of combined a bunch of different methods we found.  If it eventually works, I'll post step by step directions. :)
That's the Evil Smasher
Lol. WTF?
Stop being such a truck hipster.
it begin's at portage and main.
Judging by your comment, I'd say...  About an [](/high8)?
dude I went 4-1 with rakdos. Nobody knew wtf hit them. 8/8 guardian? block+impact. oh, and that little 1/1 flying imp = the win. I pulled a desecration demon but only got to use him once. and that 1dmg overload card killed sooo many tokens.  didn't even splash. (i felt a little bad ass)  Acutally my best pull was Armada Worm, but I didn't have enough WG to make him work. I tried going seles even after choosing rak but I couldn't, heh.
but they can't consent, she has all the power in that dynamic.
Godamn, just Godamn
How? Please explain enlightened one how democracy is a bad idea. And if you say "people are dumb" that's a bullshit argument. Saying that just makes you a narscisitic douche
Same.  She was informative, and gave some of the background on some of the myths/legends that we wouldn't have otherwise learned.  But I think after they burned through the most common "urban legend" type myths, there wouldn't have been much opportunity for her to add much.
Yeah, normally I love herbal tea but herbal version of dragon snaps isnt very good. I know how you feel. The tea shop I go to is like 50 miles away. i just wish I could remember the name.
&gt;Almost every time.
DOG gone it. You're probably right.
Was your ex called Tobias by any chance?
[](/a13 "I will...consider giving it a try") *gasp* It's discord!
i worship this
I always thought the pledge was dumb. So sometimes I would say the pledge from *In the Year of the Boar and Jackie Robinson* instead:  &gt; I pledge a lesson to the frog of the United States of America, and to the wee puppet for witches hands. One Asian, in the vestibule, with little tea and just rice for all. 
Oh my god. The imagery.  "ABANDON SHIP! MAYDAY, MAYDAY!"
Volibear tier 5 kidding me? Hes strongest solotop champs and greatest sustain while he deals lot of damage, just by stacking health.
If he says it it's OK.
I went in today to get a tour of their facilities and to see what corporate rate I would get... They don't have any prices on their website as of yet and the front desk can't give you price information either. A "trainer" gives you the tour and then sits you down for pricing. He was offering me a "deal if I signed up today and that it will most likely change by tomorrow. I hate these type of sales tactic. I was previously a member of Monster gym and they don't do business like this. Also their initiation fees are 200$ and you also pay a 59$ maintenance fee on top of that... But of course if you have a corporate rate plan or use the coupon that was sent in the mail you won't have to pay the 200$ initiation fees....   The gym wasn't crowded and the guy said that group classes aren't filling up yet so they don't have sign up sheets for the spinning room yet so I guess that's a good thing. The cardio machines with the big screen tv is not ready yet and neither is the pool. 
How so?  You keep saying "seems pretty clear it was used in a negative", yet can't articulate how it was offensive.  The word was used in the proper context and  in an academic environment.
Suprisingly, the hottest one in the pic is the Asian chick *with all of her clothes on* 
I started with this basic recipe: http://simplysogood.blogspot.in/2010/03/crusty-bread.html   And then added in some brown sugar, cinnamon, fresh ground nutmeg, and rasins. It came out wonderful with a crisp crust and a bakery-style soft inside. My apartment smells amazing!   Edit: More images here: http://hayleyse.imgur.com/all/ 
&gt; You'll ruin your relationship with your girlfriend (I'll get back to that). You'll ruin the friendship with your friend.  OP needs to realize he's acting extremely selfish. 
(( As she said, she's not combat-strength and she rarely uses it.  She's the character I used during the Twitter #solcomms event and the RP that sprang up afterward. :D ))
The only correct way to handle tripping. 
Courtesy Flush
Who cares where wisdom comes from. I bet even hitler had a few good gems.
Or the terrible PI against Seattle which was the only reason they were even in the game for the Hail Mary to matter. Nobody wants to talk about that one.
You wouldn't happen to be in Florida, would you?
&gt;...of a made up-person.  [Umm...](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Historicity_of_Muhammad#Sources_for_the_historical_Muhammad)
&gt;He had his flaws.  **He murdered millions of people and tried to conquer Europe.**  Are you fucking serious?  You think reading a book about how hard he had it will make me think less of him?  He killed *millions of people.*  Nothing trumps that.  
Haha youuu got meee :D
Yuppies.
walls around the pool.
Here is what the linked Quickmeme image says in case the site goes down or you can't reach it: &gt;Title: No fapSeptember has ended [fixed][fixed] &gt;Meme: BRACEYOSELVES &gt;* BRACE YOURSELF  &gt;* EVERYONE'S CUMMING &gt;^[[Direct](http://i.qkme.me/3r565f.jpg)] ^[[Background](http://imgur.com/MuYjZ)] ^[[Translate](http://translate.google.com/#auto||BRACE+YOURSELF+-+EVERYONE%27S+CUMMING)] This comment was left by a bot to help people who can't access Quickmeme images for any reason. Some of those reasons are described on my [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/comments/o426k/faq_for_the_qkme_transcriber_bot/) page. More information about me can be found in my first [AMA](http://www.reddit.com/r/self/comments/vxeak/hello_i_am_a_bot_who_posts_transcriptions_of/).
No.
Alright. Assuming she says yes, should I make it a classy affair and take her to the nice restaurants over in the "main street area?"  I am fairly affluent, and know a lot of girls like being treated out to a "proper date" at a fancy restaurant, but would this be excessive?
I saw.
What level are you?
Fargo? Haha
Then sir you are a braver man than I.
387
Still a win! And it helped distract me from fantasy this week, at least.
Always gotta make sure you look extra split (:
i've had lacies for years, no problems 
Oh wow, the car talk guys! That would be amazing.
Getting owned at the main menu
There aren't any.  DRtg really measures team defense when that player is on the floor.  Some people compare it to the defensive rating when that player was not on the floor.  Some people look at the opponent's PER or Win Shares or Wins Produced or what-have-you at that player's position when that player is on the floor.  If you subscribe to Synergy Sports you can find out how many points that player gave up per play when defending isolations, post-ups, pick and rolls, spot-ups, etc.  But really, none of these clearly isolate bad individual defense from bad team defense.  Often the arguments about whether someone is a good defender depend more on reputation and anecdotes than on rock-solid stats.  Still, you can try to beef up your argument with the stats I just mentioned.
woah, woah, woah there man, grease and water. 
Are you eating a lot of fat? Sounds like you're doing more of a high protein diet, which is not what keto is about. 
I'm one of the "brown people" as you put it. I'm also a Soldier and everyone treats me fine. I have daily interaction with fellow soldiers and I have never felt uneasy at all. 
Here is what the linked Quickmeme image says in case the site goes down or you can't reach it: &gt;Title: Happened to me today &gt;Meme: Bad Luck Brian &gt;* BUYS MAJORA'S MASK  &gt;* DOESN'T HAVE AN EXPANSION PACK    &gt;^[[Direct](http://i.qkme.me/3r567r.jpg)] ^[[Background](http://imgur.com/fYGyq)] ^[[Translate](http://translate.google.com/#auto||BUYS+MAJORA%27S+MASK+-+DOESN%27T+HAVE+AN+EXPANSION+PACK+++)] This comment was left by a bot to help people who can't access Quickmeme images for any reason. Some of those reasons are described on my [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/comments/o426k/faq_for_the_qkme_transcriber_bot/) page. More information about me can be found in my first [AMA](http://www.reddit.com/r/self/comments/vxeak/hello_i_am_a_bot_who_posts_transcriptions_of/).
So are you guys done or what? Post is up - stream is down. 
no web cam of wells next times.
Post it to reddit and get lots of karma.
i cant wait till seasons comes out
not as far as im aware. 
Yea this is fucking lame. 
Here is what the linked Quickmeme image says in case the site goes down or you can't reach it: &gt;Title: Something must be done &gt;* WE CAN'T LET KONY  &gt;* GET AWAY WITH IT &gt;^[[Direct](http://i.qkme.me/3r560c.jpg)] ^[[Background](http://imgur.com/sGvoM)] ^[[Translate](http://translate.google.com/#auto||WE+CAN%27T+LET+KONY+-+GET+AWAY+WITH+IT)] This comment was left by a bot to help people who can't access Quickmeme images for any reason. Some of those reasons are described on my [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/comments/o426k/faq_for_the_qkme_transcriber_bot/) page. More information about me can be found in my first [AMA](http://www.reddit.com/r/self/comments/vxeak/hello_i_am_a_bot_who_posts_transcriptions_of/).
I promise you that it varies. And these girls look like they are probably all on birth control (shorter/lighter periods) anyways. Periods are no fun, and I would call them anything but mild.
**/u/FrankReynolds**
Fuckthestatistics.
I carved styrofoam in the shapes that I wanted and then covered it in several layers of concrete in various colors and then used 100% silicone to attach it to the tank and touched up the edges and seams with concrete. I cycled it like that for about a month to get the ph down and did 100% percent water changes about everyday. Start to finish took about 3 months to get it fish ready.
I got hungry. There must be a better way to prepare them.
Need after photos for further investigation.
This. Correct me if I am wrong, but I think this was the first OF project to get any buzz.
My bad. 
Yeah, assuming your username refers to Halifax, I think it's because we have a lot of Irish and British import beer here, plus the requisite old-timey pub thing. 
Yeah, that's why I suggest actually going to the store or call to see if they know where else you could find what you're looking for. They've always been pretty nice when I go.   Edit: spelling
Because he's a billionaire.
Here is what the linked Quickmeme image says in case the site goes down or you can't reach it: &gt;Title: No Fap September from spiderman's point of view &gt;Meme: Spiderman Desk &gt;* NO FAP SEPTEMBER IS ENDING  &gt;* AND I'VE JUST BEEN SITTING HERE MASTURBATING &gt;^[[Direct](http://i.qkme.me/3r5670.jpg)] ^[[Background](http://imgur.com/xVSMN)] ^[[Translate](http://translate.google.com/#auto||NO+FAP+SEPTEMBER+IS+ENDING+-+AND+I%27VE+JUST+BEEN+SITTING+HERE+MASTURBATING)] This comment was left by a bot to help people who can't access Quickmeme images for any reason. Some of those reasons are described on my [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/comments/o426k/faq_for_the_qkme_transcriber_bot/) page. More information about me can be found in my first [AMA](http://www.reddit.com/r/self/comments/vxeak/hello_i_am_a_bot_who_posts_transcriptions_of/).
Dammit, I just killed that High Elf wizard from the college. Swapsies? :S
Recent games would probably run on minimum settings. But not recommended. 
I just want everybody to try it all at once or possibly drug a UN conference or something. Peace on Earth!!
This is what happens when we train kids to fight a war, then use them for things that require very high precision, like 'surgical' operations.  These are instruments of war, not precision.  Commanders on the ground made promises they couldn't keep.
Where exactly?
It also doesnt hurt that some of the songs off The Fall of Troy's Doppleganger were inspired by the book!
And the big Fan Fiends. such a hard part of the stage, but it's significantly less annoying on the NES version.
Nader's impact was pretty damned big, even if his numbers weren't that large.
I watched this all the time when I was a kid; I just mentioned it to my wife a few days ago actually. I was surprised that she hadn't seen it, since the sketches seem so iconic to me.  Finding out it was just a small, local show was a surprise... especially since I grew up nowhere near the Pacific northwest, and saw the show anyway somehow.
[+1](http://www.reddit.com/r/GuessTheMovie/comments/10pwfp/gtm_conference/c6fmdim "green") ***for "[GTM] - Conference" by adfuzz6***  [+3](http://www.reddit.com/r/GuessTheMovie/comments/10sctv/gtmcrucial_mistake/c6gbwo3 "blue") ***for "[GTM]Crucial mistake..." by FrankReynolds***  [+3](http://www.reddit.com/r/GuessTheMovie/comments/10qxn3/gtmyoure_waking_everybody_up/c6fzzve "blue") ***for "[GTM]You're waking everybody up" by FrankReynolds***
Here is what the linked Quickmeme image says in case the site goes down or you can't reach it: &gt;Title: How I feel as the DD. &gt;Meme: masturbating spiderman &gt;* EVERYONE ELSE IS DRINKING  &gt;* AND I'M JUST SITTING HERE MASTICATING &gt;^[[Direct](http://i.qkme.me/3r567u.jpg)] ^[[Background](http://imgur.com/KHmn2)] ^[[Translate](http://translate.google.com/#auto||EVERYONE+ELSE+IS+DRINKING+-+AND+I%27M+JUST+SITTING+HERE+MASTICATING)] This comment was left by a bot to help people who can't access Quickmeme images for any reason. Some of those reasons are described on my [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/comments/o426k/faq_for_the_qkme_transcriber_bot/) page. More information about me can be found in my first [AMA](http://www.reddit.com/r/self/comments/vxeak/hello_i_am_a_bot_who_posts_transcriptions_of/).
Its out there, the interwebs are a dark and mysterious place
In half life 1, I hit the g-man with a rocket on the level with the bridge. It didn't kill him. 
Odds that Michael Vick doesn't survive this game? 
Maybe he blinked?
Any guycode you're breaking, he broke first, even if it was with your permission and encouragement.
 A Human being? Absolutely nothing.
what if i took 100mg as my 1st roll and then i do .5g on my 5th roll, im sure id roll harder on the .5g
True. I responded the way I did because of how you phrased you statement. Common sense helps also with how you react to others when you aren't clear enough.
&gt;Martin Niemoller served in the Nazi Party as a German naval officer during WWII, then became a prominent Protestant pastor, becoming an outspoken public foe of Adolf Hitler. He spent the last seven years of Nazi rule in concentration camps. The following quote is attributed to him:  &gt;“In Germany they came first for the communists, and I didn’t speak up because I wasn’t a communist. Then, they came for the Jews and I didn’t speak up because I wasn’t a Jew. Then they came for the trade unionists, and I didn’t speak up because I wasn’t a trade unionist. Then they came for the Catholics, and I didn’t speak up because I was a Protestant. Then they came for me, and by that time no one was left to speak up.”  &gt;Wake up America. If we do not get a patriot in the White House, there will not be anyone to speak up for us.  Are you fucking kidding me? What a load of fear-mongering, narrow-minded, bigoted bullshit.  Edit: To be clear, I don't mean the quote. I mean applying the quote to *President Obama*. Suggesting that if Romney isn't elected, the US will descend into some sort of fascism? Bunk! Hooey! Codswallop! 
When my cat kneads me while I sleep- I wake up as if I'm being eviscerated. Screaming, rolling, flailing about- which makes the cat dig into my flesh more.   This guy is totally fucked. 
Wait....how can a bank still have a lien against a house when the homeowner has declared bankruptcy and got the debt discharged? 
His name is Robert Paulson.
I was, thank you for clarifying.
Because we don't follow Reddit's relationship advice.
If you try hard enough you can make the same parallels with other children's shows. It's just a result of those old stock characters writers like to work with. Off the top of my head Disney's Recess would be a perfect example of this...
I don't think he will, though it's not outside of reason to say that a guy like him wouldn't have a personal New-U station somewhere. Honestly, I wouldn't want him to appear again. Not because he's a bad villain, but because he's a pretty good one. I *wanted* to take him down. Having him get back up would just cheapen it, imo.
Sweden?
Thanks a lot! They're genuinely my favorites.  I could recall hours as a kid trying to find Remoraids and Dunspaces in Pokemon Silver. Trying to recall my experiences when I played in the early years influenced my choices.
Seems a bit spoilery for a title, no?
Oh wow. I completely forgot about this game. I played it constantly. 
Best drama on TV!
I am just an amateur, I just repeated the advice from my instructor. I would guess that playing horn that way would not be a winning proposition, but I could be wrong. I can only say from what I have been taught that is the opposite of what you want to do. My advice would be to get some private lessons, they have been invaluable to me. But I know that its hard to find a professional at an acceptable rate.
[Erowid confirms](http://www.erowid.org/chemicals/nitrous/nitrous_health.shtml) what Cowpunter said, apart from the naval cavity exploding.
Anyone seeking more info might also check here:  title | comnts | points | age | /r/ :--|:--|:--|:--|:-- [Johns weather forecasting stone!!](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/qzau5/johns_weather_forecasting_stone/) | 6^coms | 11^pts | 6^mos | funny [For when the weather man is wrong.](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/10fqsy/for_when_the_weather_man_is_wrong/) | 0^coms | -2^pts | 5^dys | funny [Well ok!](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/yv0se/well_ok/) | 0^coms | 0^pts | 1^mo | funny [The weather stone](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/qv5yy/the_weather_stone/) | 1^com | 19^pts | 6^mos | funny [TIL the Irish developed a method to forecast the weather by hanging a stone on a string](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/r7xdk/til_the_irish_developed_a_method_to_forecast_the/) | 9^coms | 14^pts | 6^mos | funny [Weather Forecasting Stone](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/qw9gk/weather_forecasting_stone/) | 2^coms | -8^pts | 6^mos | funny [Weather Forecasting Stone...](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/qqxee/weather_forecasting_stone/) | 12^coms | 216^pts | 6^mos | funny [John's latest invention.. the weather forecasting stone!](http://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/qpcs3/johns_latest_invention_the_weather_forecasting/) | 2^coms | 0^pts | 6^mos | pics [I bet this stone is never wrong](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/rcuxb/i_bet_this_stone_is_never_wrong/) | 142^coms | 603^pts | 6^mos | funny [The most accurate weather forecast](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/qnpen/the_most_accurate_weather_forecast/) | 2^coms | 15^pts | 6^mos | funny [Most advanced weather detection system in the area](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/rjpaq/most_advanced_weather_detection_system_in_the_area/) | 0^coms | 2^pts | 6^mos | funny  *[source: karmadecay](http://karmadecay.com/r/funny/comments/10qg0l/best_weather_teller_ever/)*
Hey, sorry my power went out (bad weather) but I'll play w/ you next weekend k?
Wow I am trying not to tear up from reading this...
People would kill each other for other reasons,  nationalism,  racism,  patriotism,  tribalism,  political ideology,  greed,  envy.   Its easy if you try
No, you're right. All OJ manufacturers put their juice into large vats and remove all of the oxygen to prevent it from spoiling. Unfortunately, this also causes it to lose all of its flavor, so each manufacturer has their own "flavor packet" that they add back in. This is why each brand tastes different.
Yes I did. I thought there were instances of "gay cures" actually done lovingly and without harm, i.e. those religious kids parents were like mine, not that my parents we're religious, but they did their best to make sure my behaviors were corrected in a gentle non harming way, but you can't do that with someone's sexual preference, I was totally wrong with that assumption; not the assumption that sex orientation can be changed, but you could attempt it without harm.
looks awesome! I hope your ankle gets better too!
That's why a 14 year old should legally be allowed to consent.
Shitty. O well. It's nothing huge, it would just be a nice thing to have. Maybe in Key Lime Pie (total guess at nomenclature). 
Me too man I think if I continue to jerk it, it will ruin me
Well, the person who stole it does. 
